#!/usr/bin/perl
# Created by Ben Okopnik on Tue Jun  8 22:47:05 EDT 2010
use warnings;
use strict;
use lib '../lib';
use Term::Menu::Hierarchical;

die "Syntax: ", $0 =~ /([^\/]+)$/, " [search_string]\n"
	if @ARGV && $ARGV[0] =~ /^(:?-h|--help)$/;

# Test search string, if any, for validity and compile - or set to default
my $re = @ARGV ? qr/$ARGV[0]/io : ".";

############################# Collect the data ##############################
my ($category, $subcat, $all);
while (<DATA>){
	# Any line starting with '=' is a category; '-' is a subcategory
	${$1 eq '=' ? \$category : \$subcat} = $2 and next if /^([=-])([^-].*)/;
	next unless defined $category && defined $subcat;
	$all->{$category}{$subcat} .= $_ if $category =~ /$re/ || $subcat =~ /$re/;
}
die "No matching categories or subcategories found.\n" unless defined $all;

menu($all);

__END__

=Breakfast
-Tofu Scramble

No, it doesn't actually taste like eggs!

1 pound firm tofu, mashed
1/4 tsp tumeric
1 tsp onion powder
1/2 tsp salt
1 1/2 cup chopped mixed veggies
(I've had success with garlic, mushrooms, spinach and carrots)

Place tofu in a lightly oiled pan and cook over medium heat for 3 minutes. Add
the remaining ingredients, stir, and cook for 5 to 8 minutes, until the
vegetables are cooked and the tofu is heated through.

-Eggs Benedict

This is a most delicious brunch! If you have as hard of a time finding vegan
english muffins as I did, I'll give you a tip: Wonder Bread english muffins are,
in fact, vegan. :-)

1 lb firm tofu
1/4 cup apple cider vinegar
1/4 tsp salt
1/4 cup olive oil
2 english muffins
4 slices of veggie bacon
sliced tomato
Sauce:
1/2 cup nutritional yeast
2 tbsp flour
1/2 tsp salt
1 cup water
1 tbsp oil
1 tsp Braggs or soy sauce
1 tsp dijon mustard

Preheat oven to 450. Drain tofu and cut into 8 slices. In a small bowl, whisk
together the vinegar, oil and salt. Arrange the tofu in a 6 X 9 baking dish and
pour the oil and vinegar mixture over top. Marinate for 15-30 minutes. Make sure
to turn the tofu over occasionally so each side gets marinated. Bake for 20
minutes or until crispy brown... you might want to dump out the excess liquid
for the last few minutes of baking if it's not getting very brown for you.  To
prepare the sauce, whisk together the yeast, flour, and salt. Add the water, oil
and Braggs and stir over medium heat until the sauce thickens. Stir in the
mustard and simmer over low heat until ready to serve. Toast the muffins. On
each slice of muffin, place 1 piece of bacon, 2 tofu pieces, tomato slice and
cover with the benny sauce.

-Banana Pancakes

These damn things come out perfect every time!

1 cup flour
2 tsp baking powder
1 banana, mashed
1 1/4 cups soy milk
1 tbsp sugar
sliced banana for garnish

Mix the flour and baking powder together in a large bowl. IN a small bowl, mash
the banana with a fork and add 1/4 cup of the soy milk. Mix until there are no
lumps.Stir the banana mixture into the flour mixture. Portion out about 3/4 cup
of batter onto a hot, non-stick pan or oiled frying pan and cover with a lid.
Let it sit on medium heat until the center starts to bubble and become sturdy.
Flip pancake and cook until golden brown.

Serve topped with sliced banana and maple syrup or brown rice syrup.

-French Toast

I'd never made french toast before... what on earth was I waiting for???

Loaf of Italian or French bread (a baguette), preferably stale
1/2 cup soy creamer
1/2 rice or soy milk
2 tbsp cornstarch
1/4 cup chickpea flour
vegetable or canola oil
French toast fixins: sliced bananas, strawberries, maple syrup, etc.

Slice the bread into 1 inch rounds. Mix together the creamer, milk and
cornstarch in a wide shallow bowl. Stir until the starch dissolves. Add the
flour and mix until mostly absorbed, but some lumps are ok.

Heat a nonstick skillet over medium high heat, and add a tbsp or 2 of oil to
coat the bottom.

Soak the bread slices and add to the skillet. Cook on each side for 2 or 3
minutes, until golden brown with dark brown flecks.

=Sandwiches
-Sloppy Janes

Takes you back to those pre-adolescent days!

1/2 pound tempeh
1 chopped onion
1 chopped green pepper
2 cloves garlic
2 cups Marinara Madness or other tomato sauce
1 or 2 tsp chili powder
1/2 tsp salt
buns

Steam the tempeh for 20 minutes and cut into 1/4 inch cubes Simmer the onion,
green pepper and garlic in 1/4 cup water until the vegetables are soft. Stir in
the tempeh, sauce, chili powder, and salt and simmer until heated through.

-Mushroom Sandwiches

The special sauce is sooooooooo good!!!

2 tsp balsamic vinegar
1 large clove of garlic (or if you LOVE it like me, use *4* cloves)
salt and pepper, to taste
4 tbls olive oil
2 large portabello mushrooms
Random veggies that you like (like an onion or tomato) optional
loaf of very nice bread

Put vinegar, garlic, salt, pepper and olive oil in a small jar and shake well.
Set aside Slice the mushrooms and veggies and brush with oil. Bake at 350 for 15
minutes (or until they are done), flipping them once while baking. Spread the
special sauce on the very nice bread and enjoy!

-Corn Dogs

Never again pick up the box of Morningstar Farms corndogs, and get sad when you
realize that they aren't vegan!

6 Smart Dogs
6 skewers
1/2 cup yellow corn meal
1/2 cup flour
1 tsp dry mustard
1/2 tsp salt
egg replacer = 1 egg
1 tbsp sugar
1 tsp baking powder
1/2 cup soy milk
1 tbsp melted shortening

Combine the cornmeal, flour, sugar, mustard, baking powder and salt. Mix well.
Add the soy milk, egg replacer, and shortening and mix until very smooth. Pour
the misture into a tall glass.  Put the Smart Dogs on the sticks and dip them in
the cornmeal batter to coat them evenly.  Deep fry in oil heated to 350 degrees
until golden brown, about 2 miinutes. Drain on paper towels.

-Chicken and Sun-Dried Tomato Sandwiches with Basil Olive Pesto

Oooooh, this makes such a good sandwich for a special lunch!

Sandwiches:
3 ounces dried tomatoes (about 3/4 cup), not packed in oil
a long loaf (about 20 inches) French or Italian bread OR individual loaves of panini
about 1/2 cup basil olive pesto
6 to 8 ounces veggie chicken or turkey slices
1/2 bunch arugula, trimmed, washed well, and spun dry (about 1 cup)

Basil olive pesto:
1 large garlic clove
1 cup packed fresh basil leaves, washed well and spun dry
1 cup packed fresh parsley leaves (preferably flat-leaf), washed well and spun dry
1/3 cup pine nuts
1/4 cup olive oil
1/4 cup Kalamata or other brine-cured black olives, pitted and chopped fine

Make sandwiches: In a heatproof bowl pour enough boiling water over tomatoes to
cover and let stand 20 to 30 minutes, or until soft. Drain tomatoes and pat dry.
Cut loaf diagonally into 4 pieces and halve each piece horizontally. Spread
pesto on cut sides of bread and make 4 sandwiches with chicken, tomatoes, and
arugula.

Make Basil Olive Pesto: To a food processor with motor running add garlic and
blend until minced. Add basil, parsley, and nuts and blend well. Add oil and
blend until smooth. Transfer pesto to a bowl and stir in olives. Pesto may be
made 5 days ahead and chilled, surface covered tightly with plastic wrap. Bring
pesto to room temperature before using. Makes about 3/4 cup.

If you want to go OVER THE TOP and make, literally, the Best Sandwich In The
World, bake a loaf of Annie's Rosemary Garlic Bread and make this sandwich on it
while the bread is still hot from the oven. It is sinful and decadent.


=Salads
-Radish and Tomato Salad with Yoghurt Dressing

Just made this, and really, really enjoyed it. Diet food doesn't have to mean "tasteless"!
Serves 2.

6 large radishes
2 tomatoes
3 tbsp plain yoghurt, chilled
1 clove garlic, chopped fine
1 tbsp sesame oil
Salt, pepper, cumin to taste

Slice radishes and tomatoes (optionally, chop them fine for a completely
different texture experience.) Add all the other ingredients and mix thoroughly.
Makes a lovely, cooling summer salad.

-Baby Greens, Pear, Almond and Feta Salad

Good God, this is tasty!

3 tbsp lemon juice
1 tbsp dijon mustard
1 1/2 tsp fresh thyme
1/2 cup olive oil

1 bag mixed baby greens
2 ripe pears, halved, cored, thinly sliced lengthwise
1 cup crumbled fake feta
1cup almonds, toasted, coarsely chopped

Whisk first 4 ingredients in a bowl to blend. Season dressing to taste with salt
and pepper.

Toss greens with enough dressing to coat. Divide among 2 or 3 plates. Top each
serving with pear slices. Sprinkle with feta and almonds. Drizzle the top
lightly with the remaining dressing.

-Tuna Salad

Tastes so much like real tuna fish, it's scary!

1 pound frozen firm tofu, thawed
1 rib celery, chopped
2 tbls grated carrot
2 tble soy sauce
1/2 cup Tofu Mayonaise or other egg-free mayo
1 tbls lemon juice
1/2 tsp kelp or kombu powder (optional, but this is what makes it fishy)

Squeeze the excess moisture out of the thawed tofu, and crumble it into small
pieces. Combine with the bell pepper and carrot.  Stir in the rest of the
ingredients and mix well.

If you want to make an extra special tuna salad, mix in these things as
well..... 1/2 cup roasted red peppers and kalamata olives cut into strips. Yum!


-Chicken Salad

This makes quite a nice sandwich!

2 cups vegan chicken tenders
1/2 cup diced celery
15 - 20 thinly sliced grapes
1/4 cup slivered almonds
pinch of baby dill
salt and pepper to taste
4 heaping tablespoons of Veganaise

Fry up the chicken tenders in a bit of oil. Let them thaw and brown until they
are golden (about 10 minutes). Toast the slivered almonds in the oven for a few
minutes (5 to 7 min.) Remove both chicken and almonds from heat and let cool for
a few minutes. Cut up the tenders so they are a bit smaller. Add 2 tablespoons
of veganaise.  Chop up the celery, grapes, and dill. Add to the chicken and
veganaise and stir. Add the other two tablespoons of veganaise and almonds to
the mixture. Add a bit of salt and pepper to taste.


-Mixed Lettuces with Reduced Balsamic Vinaigrette

Who knew cooking balsamic vinegar made it turn so extra sweet!

1/2 cup balsamic vinegar
1/2 cup walnut oil
salt and freshly ground black pepper
Bag of mixed baby greens

Croutons

Place vinegar in a small saucepan. Bring to a boil and cook for 5 minutes, until
reduced by half. measure to make sure you have 1/4 cup. Pour into a bowl and
whick in the oil. Sprinkle with salt and pepper. Toss with greens and croutons.


-Mixed Green Salad with Strawberry Dressing

This is a perfect summer salad... the results are downright magical!

1 1-pound basket strawberries, hulled, halved
1 5-ounce package mixed baby greens
chopped up fake feta cheese or spy mozzerella (about 1 1/3 cups)
1/2 cup walnuts, toasted
1/2 cup olive oil
3 tablespoons balsamic vinegar
1 tablespoon sugar

Mash enough strawberries to measure 1/3 cup. Place remaining strawberries in
large bowl. Add greens, cheese, and nuts. Whisk oil, vinegar, and sugar in small
bowl to blend. Whisk in mashed strawberries. Season dressing with salt and
pepper. Add to salad; toss to coat.


-Quinoa Salad with Pistachios and Dried Pineapple

This is a very tasty high protein treat!

1 1/2 cups water
3/4 cup uncooked quinoa
1/4 cup shelled, chopped pistachios (about 1 ounce)
1 package of Tofurkey slices, chopped
1/3 cup chopped green onions
1/3 cup chopped dried pineapple
1 tablespoon toasted sesame oil
1 1/2 grated fresh ginger
1/2 teaspoon ground cumin
1/2 teaspoon salt
1/4 teaspoon crushed red pepper

Boil water in a small saucepan. Add quinoa. Cover, reduce heat, and simmer 12 minutes.

Heat a small skillet over medium-high heat. Add chopped pistachios, and cook 2
minutes or until lightly toasted, stirring frequently. Transfer pistachios to a
large bowl; add cooked quinoa and remaining ingredients to bowl. Toss gently to
coat.


-Chipotle Chicken Taco Salad

This is very flavorful and wonderful! If you want to add more to the meal, this
simple fruit salad goes with it and will knock your socks off: Combine 2 cups
cubed watermelon, 1 cup cubed mango.... whisk together 1 1/2 tbsp lime juice, 2
tsp honey or agave and 1/8 tsp salt and pour it over the fruit... it is
heavenly! You can also serve this with tortilla chips.

Dressing:

1/3 cup chopped fresh cilantro
2/3 cup soy sour cream
1 tablespoon minced chipotle chile, canned in adobo sauce
1 teaspoon ground cumin
1 teaspoon chili powder
4 teaspoons fresh lime juice
1/4 teaspoon salt

Salad:

4 cups shredded romaine lettuce
2 cups chopped fake chicken or chicken style seitan, lightly sauteed
1 cup cherry tomatoes, halved
1/2 cup diced peeled avocado
1/3 cup thinly vertically sliced red onion
1 (15-ounce) can black, pinto or kidney beans, rinsed and drained
1 (8 3/4-ounce) can corn, rinsed and drained

To prepare dressing, combine first 7 ingredients, stirring well.

To prepare salad, combine lettuce and remaining ingredients in a large bowl.
Drizzle dressing over salad; toss gently to coat. Serve immediately.

=Meals
-Rosemary Chicken

This has been called "The best seitan ever"

1 lb package "chicken-style" seitan, drained
6 tbsp margarine
2 tbsp olive oil
2 tsp dried rosemary leaves, crushed
1 tsp dried thyme
1/2 tsp dried sage
3 cloves garlic, finely chopped

Grease a 9 X 13 pan with 1 tbsp olive oil. Preheat oven to 350. Arrange the
seitan pieces in the bottom of the dish.  In a small saucepan, heat remaining
olive oil and add margarine to melt. Once melted, add the garlic, rosemary, sage
and thyme. Allow to simmer for a few minutes.  Pour the melted magarine
mixture over the seitan pieces and bake for 20 minutes, turning once.

-Cilantro Lime Tofu and Black Beans

1 block of extra firm tofu packed in water
1 can of black beans (or about 15 ounces of cooked black beans)
3 limes zested and juiced
1/2 teaspoon sugar
1 bunch of cilantro chopped
2 tablespoons of veggie oil
sea salt and fresh ground black pepper to taste

Use your preferred method to press the tofu for at least 1/2 hour. Slice
the tofu into bite size chunks.  Add the tofu, 1/2 the lime juice, 1/2 the
lime zest, 1/2 the cilantro, the oil, sugar, salt and pepper to a container
and marinate for at least a 1/2 hour. (overnight is optimal)

Cook the tofu in a skillet - you can use the marinade, another tablespoon
of veggie oil or non-stick spray to cook it in - until it is golden brown
on both sides (about 10 minutes).
While the tofu is cooking, add the beans, the remaining cilantro, lime
juice and zest to a pot and heat through.
Serve the tofu on top of the beans. I like to serve this with an avocado,
tomato and corn relish on the side.
This is also tasty wrapped up as a burrito with salsa and soy cheese.

Serves: 2-4
Preparation time: 1 hour hands off, 20 minutes hands on time

-Tofu Cacciatore

Serve this with some nice pasta and you will have a lovely meal!

1 lb firm tofu OR use 2 1-lb packages of "chicken-style" seitan, drained
1 tsp olive oil
1 onion, diced
3 cloves garlic, minced
3 tbls tomato paste
3/4 cup vegetable broth
1 cup canned tomatoes
1/2 cup sliced mushrooms
1/2 cup dry white wine
1 tsp dried parsley
1 bay leaf
1/2 tsp salt
1/2 tsp ground allspice
1/4 tsp dried rosemary
1/4 tsp dried basil
1/4 tsp black pepper

Drain tofu and pat dry. Cut into 1/2 inch squares.  Heat oil in a large skillet
over medium heat. Saute the onion and garlic for 2 minutes. Add tomato paste,
broth, tomatoes, mushrooms, wine, herbs, salt and spices and stir until blended.
Bring saice to a boil, reduce heat, and simmer, covered, for 20 minutes,
stirring often.  Add the tofu and simmer until tofu is heated through.

-Fettucine Alfredo

This is so rich and creamy, no one would ever know it wasn't the real thing!

1 package silken tofu
1 tbsp soymarg
1/4 cup "sour cream"
2 tbsp "cream cheese"
1/4 cup vegan parmesan
1 tsp garlic powder
salt and pepper
soymilk

Put all into a blender with 1/2 cup soymilk. Blend to a creamy sauce, adding
soymilk to achieve desired consistency. Heat gently until hot, but do not boil.
Serve over fettucine.

-Shepherd's Pie

This makes a most delicious meal!!

Filling:
1 small onion, chopped
3 small carrots, chopped
1/2 cup spinach, chopped
1 stalk celery, chopped
1 large tomato, chopped
2 tbsp olive oil
15 oz can of lentils, mashed
1/2 tsp dried basil
1/2 tsp salt
1 tbsp Braggs or soy sauce
Topping:
3 medium potatoes, roughly chopped
1/4 cup soy milk
1 tbsp margarine
salt to taste

Preheat over to 350 F. Boil or steam the chopped potatoes until they can be
pierced easily. In a medium saucepan, saute the onions, carrots, spinach, celery
and tomatoes in the oil. Once carrots are tender, add the mashed lentils,
basil, salt, and Braggs. Stir and simmer without a lid until the liquid cooks
off.  In a large bowl, mash together the potatoes, soy milk, margarine and salt
with a potato masher or fork. Set aside. Pour the vegetable mixture into a
lightly oiled 9 X 9 baking dish. Layer the mashed potatoes over the top. Bake
for 15 - 20 minutes.

-Soba Noodles with Spicy Tofu Peanut Sauce

This sauce is very smooth and full of peanut butter goodness!

soba noodles (either 1 or 2 pounds, depending on how many people are eating)
6 tbsp minced cilantro
2 large cucumbers, peeled, seeded and sliced into matchsticks
5 tbsp chopped scallions
10 oz firm tofu
2 cloves garlic
1 inch piece fresh ginger, minced
1/2 tbsp cayenne pepper
1/4 cup soy sauce
2 tbsp honey (or agave nector, if you don't use honey)
1 cup soy milk
1 cup natural smooth peanut butter

Cook pasta, drain and let them cool down a bit.  Trasfer noodles to a large
bowl. Add cilantro, cucumbers and scallions and toss gently.  In a food
processor or blender, whip the tofu until smooth. Add the garlic, ginger and soy
sauce and blend until combined In a medium saucepan over moderate heat, combine
the honey, soy milk and peanut butter and stir constantly until mixed Remove
from heat and add the tofu mixture, and beat with a wire whip. If it seems too
thick, add more soy milk. Serve with the sauce spooned over the noodles.

-Broccoli and Rice Casserole

This is a good thing to eat if you are craving something cheesy!

1 bunch of broccoli, cut into florets
2 cups white rice
1 stick of vegan margarine
1/2 cup all-purpose flour
3 1/2 cups boiling water
2 tsp salt
1 tbsp soy sauce or tamari
1 1/2 tsp garlic powder
1 tsp onion powder
pinch of tumeric
1 cup nutritional yeast flakes
salt and pepper to taste
pinch of paprika

Steam the broccoli, about 6 minutes. Prepare the rice according to package
directions.  Spread the cooked rice evenly over the bottom of a 9 X 13 bakiing
dish. Sprinkle the broccoli over the rice and set aside.  Preheat oven to 350
degrees Melt the margarine in a medium frying pan over low heat. Beat in the
flour with a whisk over medium heat until the mixture is smooth and bubbly, the
whisk in the boiling water, salt, soy sauce, garlic and onion powders, and
tumeric. Cook the sauce until it thickens and bubbles, then whip in the yeast.
Add salt and pepper to taste.  Pour the sauce over the broccoli and rice,
sprinkle the top with paprika, and bake for 15 minutes.

-Bean and Cheese Casserole

I'm a big fan of the bean/potato combo.

5-6 small potatoes, sliced
1 tbsp dijon mustard
1 can of baked beans
2 tsp pepper
2 cups grated soy cheese

Preheat oven to 400. Boil or steam the potatoes until they can be easily pierced
with a fork. In a small bowl, mix together the beans, mustard and pepper. Place
half of the cooked potatoes in a lightly oiled casserole dish. Now, you'll put
this together like a lasagna, with a layer of beans and a layer of cheese. Then,
repeat with another layer of the remaining potatoes, the rest of the beans and
the rest of the cheese. Cover and bake for 35 - 40 minutes.

-Tia's Mac N Cheese

Tia sent me this all the way from Austraila... and damn, I like it!

1/4 cup flour
1/2 cup nutritional yeast
1/3 cup soy marg
1 1/2 cup water
1-2 sloshes soy sauce
2 tsp mustard
pepper to taste

Toast flour and yeast in a pan until they smell nutty. Add marg and stir til
bubbly. Add water and cook until it thickens, stirring constantly. When it is
thick, stir in the remaining ingredients.

Stir this into a pot of shells or elbows or penne.

-Penne With Eggplant, Olives and Feta

I almost had a religious experience the first time I made this!

8 tbsp olive oil
3/4 pound diced bell peppers (I mix red and green)
8 garlic cloves, minced
1 tsp dried crushed red pepper
1 eggplant, cut into 1/2 inch cubes
1 tbsp dried oregano
28 oz can diced tomatoes in juice
1 cup sliced fresh basil
3/4 cup coursely chopped kalmata olives
1 can tomato paste
2 tbsp red wine vinegar
12 oz penne
14 ounces fake feta

Brush 13x9x2-inch glass baking dish with 2 tablespoons oil.  Heat remaining 6
tablespoons oil in heavy large pot over medium-high heat. Add bell peppers,
garlic and crushed pepper; sauté 3 minutes. Add eggplant and oregano.  Reduce
heat to medium-low. Cover; cook until eggplant softens, stirring often, about 15
minutes.

Mix in tomatoes with juices, 1/2 cup basil, olives, tomato paste and vinegar.
Cover; simmer until all vegetables are tender, stirring occasionally, about 12
minutes.  Season with salt and pepper.

Cook pasta in large pot of boiling salted water until just tender but still firm
to bite; drain well. Stir pasta into vegetable mixture. Transfer to prepared
dish.  Cover dish with foil. (Can be prepared 1 day ahead. Refrigerate.)

Preheat oven to 350°F. Bake pasta covered until heated through, about 20 minutes
(40 minutes if refrigerated). Sprinkle with fake feta, then 1/2 cup basil.

-Baked Mac and Cheese

This isn't dried out the way some baked Mac and Cheese is... it's really juicy and tasty.

1 1/2 cups of plain soymilk
1 cup of water
1/3 cup of tamari or soy sauce
1 1/2 cup of nutritional yeast
1 tbsp. paprika
1 tbsp. garlic powder
1 tbsp. salt
5 oz firm (not silken) tofu
1 cup of canola or vegetable oil
1 1/2 lbs macaroni
a relatively large baking pan (like a brownie pan)
1 dollop of mustard

Pre-heat oven to 350 degrees Fahrenheit.  Boil water in a big pot for the pasta.
Blend all ingredients besides pasta in a food processor.  Once pasta is cooked
drain and put it in the baking pan pour the "cheese" sauce over the pasta.  Bake
until the top of the pasta looks slightly browned and crispy - about 15 minutes.

-Baked Ziti

This brought me right back to my youth in New Jersey!

8 oz. seitan
2-3 cups of mushrooms, sliced
25 oz. jar of tomato sauce
1 box extra firm silken tofu
1/3 cup fresh basil, roughly chopped
2-3 Tbls. fresh lemon juice
2 tsp. olive oil
salt and pepper to taste
1 box ziti (16 oz.)

Preheat oven to 400 degrees F.  Cook Ziti according to package directions and
drain when finished.  Mince the seitan and mushrooms in a food processor until
course and crumbly. Pour mushroom and seitan mixture into a large saucepan and
stir in tomato sauce. Bring to a simmer over medium heat and cook for about 10
minutes.

In a food processor, puree the tofu, basil, lemon, olive oil, and salt and
pepper until consistancy is similar to ricotta cheese.  Spread some of the
tomato-seitan mixture into the bottom of a 13 x 9 inch baking pan so that it
coats the bottom.  Combine the drained Ziti, tofu mixture, and remaining
tomato-seitan mixture in a large bowl and mix gently to combine all ingredients.
Spread evenly into the 13 x 9 inch baking pan and bake for 15 minutes.

-Fusilli with Fresh Tomato and Olive Sauce

Wow, I think this might be the best Pasta I have ever made!

1/4 cup olive oil
1 cup Kalamata olives or other brine-cured black olives, pitted, chopped
1 medium onion, chopped
6 garlic cloves, chopped
1/2 teaspoon dried crushed red pepper
1 1/2 pounds plum tomatoes (about 8 large), chopped
2 tablespoons tomato paste
2 tablespoons red wine vinegar
1 pound fusilli, freshly cooked
1 1/2 cups soy cheese (I used a combo of soy parm and soy mozzerella)
1 cup chopped fresh basil

Heat olive oil in heavy large pot over medium-high heat. Add olives, chopped
onion, chopped garlic and crushed red pepper and sauté until onion begins to
soften, about 4 minutes. Add tomatoes and tomato paste and stir until tomatoes
are just warmed through, about 2 minutes. Mix in red wine vinegar. Add cooked
pasta, soy cheese and fresh basil and toss to combine. Season to taste with salt
and pepper. Transfer to large bowl.

-Spaghettini with Garlic and Lemon

This is nice and lemon-y good!

1 lb spaghettini or capellini
4 large garlic cloves, minced
1/2 to 3/4 teaspoon dried hot red pepper flakes
1/2 cup extra-virgin olive oil
Finely grated zest from 2 lemons
3 tablespoons fresh lemon juice
1 1/2 teaspoons salt
1/2 teaspoon black pepper
1/2 cup chopped fresh flat-leaf parsley

Cook pasta in a 6-quart pot of boiling salted water until al dente. Reserve 1
cup cooking water and drain pasta in a colander.  While pasta is boiling, cook
garlic and red pepper flakes (to taste) in oil in a 12-inch heavy skillet over
moderate heat, stirring, until garlic is golden, about 5 minutes. Stir in zest,
then juice, salt, pepper, and 1/2 cup reserved cooking water and bring to a
simmer.  Toss pasta in sauce with parsley. (Add more cooking water if pasta
seems dry.)

-Asian Eggplant

Serve this with some nice rice!

1/2 bunch fresh cilantro, stems trimmed
5 tablespoons canned low-salt chicken-free or vegetable broth
2 green onions, chopped
2 large garlic cloves
1 small jalapeño chili, chopped
1 tablespoon minced peeled fresh ginger
4 tablespoons peanut oil
1 1 1/4-pound eggplant (cut lengthwise into 3/4-inch-wide
	slices and cut slices crosswise into 3/4-inch-wide-strips)
1 tablespoon soy sauce

Combine cilantro, 1 tablespoon broth, green onions, garlic, chili and ginger in
processor and puree until paste forms.  Heat 2 tablespoons oil in heavy large
nonstick skillet over high heat until very hot. Add half of eggplant. Cover
skillet and cook until eggplant is tender and beginning to brown, turning once,
about 5 minutes. Transfer to paper towels. Repeat with remaining 2 tablespoons
oil and remaining eggplant.  Add cilantro paste and soy sauce to skillet and
stir over medium-high heat 2 minutes. Return eggplant to skillet and add
remaining 4 tablespoons broth. Stir until sauce thickens and boils and eggplant
is heated through, about 3 minutes. Season with salt and pepper.

-Coconut Curried Tofu with Green Jasmine Rice

You might want to top this off with some nice hot sauce.

1/4 cup unsweetened shredded coconut

1 3/4 cups water
1 teaspoon salt
1 cup jasmine or basmati rice

1 cup (packed) coarsely chopped fresh cilantro
3/4 cup unsweetened light coconut milk
4 teaspoons minced fresh ginger
1 tablespoon fresh lime juice
2 large garlic cloves, minced
2 tablespoons vegetable oil
16 ounces extra-firm tofu, drained, patted dry, cut into 1/2-inch cubes
1/2 cup thinly sliced green onions
2 teaspoons curry powder
1 teaspoon ground cumin
1/8 teaspoon dried crushed red pepper
1 cup whole small cherry tomatoes
2 tablespoons chopped peanuts

Stir shredded coconut in small nonstick skillet over medium heat until light
golden, about 5 minutes. Transfer to bowl.  Bring 1 3/4 cups water and salt to
boil in heavy medium saucepan. Stir in rice; bring to boil. Reduce heat to low,
cover, and simmer until water is absorbed and rice is tender, about 18 minutes.

Meanwhile, puree cilantro, 1/2 cup coconut milk, 1 teaspoon ginger, lime juice,
and half of garlic in blender. Mix puree and coconut into rice. Set aside.
Heat oil in large nonstick skillet over high heat. Add tofu; stir-fry until
golden, about 6 minutes. Add onions, curry, cumin, red pepper, remaining ginger,
and remaining garlic. Stir-fry 1 minute. Stir in tomatoes and remaining
coconut milk. Season with salt and pepper.  Divide rice among 4 plates. Top with
tofu mixture. Sprinkle with peanuts.

-Rice and Beans

I know rice and beans seems boring, but this version is snappy and great. Makes
a good burrito, side dish or a meal on its own!

1 tablespoon oil
1 onion, diced small
1 tablespoon minced garlic
1 roasted red bell pepper, thinly sliced
one 16-ounce can black beans or 2 cups cooked black beans
2 Tbsp white vinegar
5 to 10 dashes Tabasco sauce or other hot red pepper sauce
1/4 cup roughly chopped cilantro
3 cups cooked long grain rice
salt and freshly milled black pepper

In a large sauté pan, heat the oil over medium-high heat until hot but not
smoking. Add the onion, and sauté, stirring occasionally, until transparent, 5
to 7 minutes.  Add the garlic and roasted pepper, and sauté, stirring
occasionally, for an additional 2 minutes. Add the black beans, vinegar, and
Tabasco sauce. Bring the mixture to a boil; reduce the heat to low, cover, and
simmer 5 minutes. Add the cilantro and rice; mix well. Season to taste with the
salt and black pepper. Serve accompanied by additional hot pepper sauce.


-Penne Alla Vodka

This is a great creamy pasta delight!

Salt
One 35-ounce can Italian plum tomatoes with their liquid
1 pound penne
1/4 cup extra-virgin olive oil
10 cloves garlic, peeled
Crushed hot red pepper
1/4 cup vodka
1/2 cup heavy vegan cream (blend silken tofu and soy milk)
2 tablespoons soy marg or olive oil for finishing the sauce, if you like
2 to 3 tablespoons chopped fresh Italian parsley
3/4 cup soy parm, plus more for passing if you like

Bring 6 quarts of salted water to a boil in an 8-quart pot over high heat.

Pour the tomatoes and their liquid into the work bowl of a food processor. Using
quick on/off pulses, process the tomatoes just until they are finely chopped.
(Longer processing will aerate the tomatoes, turning them pink.)

Stir the penne into the boiling water. Bring the water back to a boil, stirring
frequently. Cook the pasta, semi-covered, stirring occasionally, until done, 8
to 10 minutes.

Meanwhile, heat the olive oil in a large skillet over medium heat. Whack the
garlic cloves with the side of a knife and add them to the hot oil. Cook,
shaking the skillet, until the garlic is lightly browned, about 3 minutes. Lower
the work bowl with the tomatoes close to the skillet and carefully — they will
splatter — slide the tomatoes into the pan. Bring to a boil, season lightly with
salt and generously with crushed red pepper, and boil 2 minutes. Pour in the
vodka, lower the heat so the sauce is at a lively simmer, and simmer until the
pasta is ready.

Just before the pasta is done, fish the garlic cloves out of the sauce and pour
in the cream. Add the 2 tablespoons butter or oil, if using, and swirl the
skillet to incorporate into the sauce. If the skillet is large enough to
accommodate the sauce and pasta, fish the pasta out of the boiling water with a
large wire skimmer and drop it directly into the sauce in the skillet. If not,
drain the pasta, return it to the pot, and pour in the sauce. Bring the sauce
and pasta to a boil, stirring to coat the pasta with sauce. Check the seasoning,
adding salt and red pepper if necessary. Sprinkle the parsley over the pasta and
boil until the sauce is reduced enough to cling to the pasta.

Remove the pot from the heat, sprinkle 3/4 cup of the soy parm over the pasta,
and toss to mix. Serve immediately, passing additional parm if you like.


-Red Lentil Dal

Enjoy some Indian food without worrying they snuck some ghee into it!

1 tablespoon vegetable oil
2 cups chopped onions
3 garlic cloves, minced
3 cups water
1 cup dried red lentils
3/4 teaspoon turmeric
3/4 teaspoon ground cumin
1/2 teaspoon ground ginger
1 cup basmati rice, cooked according to package directions
2 plum tomatoes, seeded, chopped
1/4 cup chopped fresh cilantro
1 jalapeño chili, seeded, chopped

Heat oil in medium skillet over medium heat. Add 1 cup onion and 1 minced garlic
clove and sauté until tender and golden brown, about 10 minutes. Set aside.
Combine 3 cups water, lentils, remaining 1 cup onion, 2 minced garlic cloves,
turmeric, cumin and ginger in heavy medium saucepan. Bring to boil. Reduce heat,
cover and simmer until lentils are tender, about 15 minutes. Transfer half of
lentil mixture to processor; purée until smooth. Return purée to same saucepan.
Mix in sautéed onion mixture. Simmer 5 minutes to blend flavors. Season to taste
with salt and pepper. Spoon rice into bowls. Spoon dal over. Top with tomatoes,
cilantro and chili.


-Indian Eggplant

This is the best tasting eggplant dish I have ever eaten! I serve it along with
the red lentil dal, and have an Indian feast, but it would be a good meal all on
it's own with some nice basmati rice.

1 teaspoon ground coriander seeds
1/2 teaspoon ground cumin
1/2 teaspoon ground turmeric
1/4 teaspoon ground cloves
1/4 teaspoon ground cinnamon
1/4 teaspoon ground cardamom
3/4 cup water
1 tablespoon sugar
1 tablespoon red-wine vinegar
1 small eggplant (about 3/4 pound)
2 tablespoons soy marg
1 teaspoon salt
2 tablespoons chopped fresh cilantro

In a small bowl combine spices and in a measuring cup stir together water,
sugar, and vinegar. Cut eggplant into 2-inch pieces. In a large heavy non-stick
skillet heat soy marg over moderate heat until foam subsides and cook spices,
stirring, until fragrant, about 1 minute. Add eggplant and salt and toss to coat
with spice mixture.  Stir vinegar mixture and add to eggplant mixture. Simmer
mixture, covered, without stirring, 10 minutes, or until eggplant is just
tender. Uncover skillet and cook eggplant mixture at a rapid simmer, without
stirring, until liquid is almost evaporated and eggplant is slightly charred
(but not burned) on bottom, about 15 minutes.

Remove skillet from heat and let eggplant stand, covered, 5 minutes.

Serve eggplant sprinkled with fresh coriander.


-Chinese Chicken Curry

For the fake chicken, I'd reccomend a Follow your Heart chicken. If they don't
have that where you live, I'd use 2 paskages of White Wave's Chicken-Style
Seitan. And if you don't like to eat fake meats, I believe extra-firm tofu would
work quite nicely.

6 tablespoons oil
1 medium onion, chopped
2 tomatoes, chopped
2 tablespoons curry powder
2 tablespoons soy sauce
2 teaspoons minced peeled fresh ginger
2 garlic cloves, minced
1 teaspoon ground turmeric
1 teaspoon chili powder
1/2 pound boiling potatoes, cut into 1-inch cubes
1 cup unchicken broth
1 tablespoon dry white wine
1 pound fake chicken, cut into 2-inch pieces
1/2 cup golden raisins
1/4 cup soy sour cream
Salt and pepper

Heat 6 tablespoons oil in wok or heavy large skillet over medium-high heat. Add
onion and stir-fry until translucent, about 5 minutes. Add tomatoes and next 6
ingredients and stir 4 minutes. Mix in potatoes, broth and wine. Cover and
simmer 10 minutes. Add chicken; cover and cook until potatoes are tender and
chicken is cooked through, about 10 minutes. Stir in raisins and sour cream.
Season to taste with salt and freshly ground pepper.


-Portabello Mushroom Bake

This is so wonderful served over rice and with a nice green leafy vegetable.

1/2 cups almonds
1/4 cup olive oil
1/4 cup Braggs
1/4 cup water
2 tbsp balsamic vinegar
3 cloves garlic, roughly chopped
1 tsp dried rosemary
1 tsp dried oregano
4 large portabello mushrooms, stems removed
1 medium onion, sliced

Preheat oven to 350. In a blender or food processor, blend the almonds until
powdered. Add oil, Braggs, water, vinegar, garlic, rosemary and oregano and
blend until well combined. In a large baking dish, place the mushrooms upside
down and top with onions. Pour sauce over and bake for 20 - 25 minutes.


-Chick Pea Curry

This is a really nice and authentic tasting Indian dish.

2 onions, chopped
1/2 cup soy marg
8 oz tomato sauce
8 cloves garlic, minced
2 tsp tumeric
1 tsp cumin
1 tsp allspice
1 1/2 tsp cayenne pepper (or to taste)
4 cans garbanzo beans
2 green peppers, chopped
Salt to taste

Saute onions in soy marg until golden, then add tomato sauce, garlic and spices.
Saute for a few minutes, then add garbanzo beans and green pepper. Saute for 5 -
10 minutes. Add salt to taste.


-Beef Stroganoff

This is my favorite vegan version of this dish that I have ever found.

1 (8-ounce) carton soy sour cream
3 tablespoons tomato paste
1 teaspoon vegan Worcestershire sauce
1/2 cup all-purpose flour
1 teaspoon salt
1/8 teaspoon freshly ground black pepper
2 packages seitan, cut into 2-inch chunks (I used WhiteWave's original style)
1 tablespoon soy marg
1/2 cup chopped onion
14-ounces vegetable broth
2 cups sliced mushrooms
Chopped fresh parsley (optional)
8 cups cooked eggless noodles (about 7 cups uncooked pasta)

Combine the first 3 ingredients in a bowl. Set aside. Lightly spoon flour into a
dry measuring cup; level with a knife. Combine flour, salt, and pepper in a
large zip-top plastic bag. Add seitan; seal and shake to coat seitan with flour
mixture.

Melt soy marg in a large nonstick skillet over medium-high heat. Add onion to
pan; sauté 2 minutes or until tender. Add seitan and flour mixture to pan; sauté
3 minutes or until seitan is browned. Gradually add broth, scraping pan to
loosen browned bits. Add mushrooms; cover and cook 5 minutes or until mushrooms
are tender. Reduce heat to low; gradually stir in sour cream mixture. Cook,
uncovered, 1 minute or until heated (do not boil). Stir in parsley, if desired.
Serve over the eggless noodles.


-Mushroom, Sausage and Spinach Lasagna

I've experimented with many lasagna recipes in my day, and finally, I have
selected this one as my signature lasagne. It is very easy as far as lasagne
goes and it is amazingly delicious. This will impress any meat and dairy eating
lasagne lover!

1 lb firm tofu
juice from 1/2 lemon
1/4 cup fresh basil leaves
1/2 tsp sugar
1 tsp salt
1/2 tsp garlic granules
1 lb soy sausage (I use Gimme Lean)
10 ounces sliced mushrooms
1/4 cup water
1 lb frozen spinach, thawed
28 oz can crushed tomatoes
1/2 cup water
salt and pepper to taste
8 oz. lasagne noodles, uncooked
8 oz shredded soy mozzarella

Preheat oven to 350 degrees.

Combine tofu, lemon juice, basil, sugar, salt and garlic in a food processor and
blend until smooth. Set aside.

Coat a skillet with olive oil or cooking spray and cook the sausage until
browned, breaking it up into chunks as you cook it, about 4 minutes. Add
mushrooms and 1/4 cup water and cook until mushrooms are tender, about 8
minutes. Squeeze excess water from spinach and add to the pan. Mix together and
remove from heat.

Mix the tomatoes with 1/2 water and salt and pepper to taste.

To assemble lasagna: Coat a lasagne baking dish with cooking spray. Spread a
little bit of the tomatoes on the bottom. Cover with a layer of raw lasange
noodles. Spread 1/2 of the tofu mixture on top of the noodles. Top with half of
the sausage mixture. Top with half of the remaining tomatoes. And add half of
the mozzerella. For the second layer, do one more of noodles, one more of the
tofu mixture, one more of the sausage, one more of the tomatoes and finish with
the rest of the mozzerella.

Cover with foil and bake for about 1 hour and 20 minutes. The noodles should be
cooked by then, but stick a knife in and check them just to be sure. Let sit for
a few minutes before you cut into it to serve, or you will make a mess.


-Turkey and Sausage Paella

I've been really into meals that have everything you need (veggies, grains and
protein) all living happily together in one dish. This Paella has a great flavor
and will thrill vegans and carnivores alike!

2 3/4 cups un-chicken or veggie broth
1/4 teaspoon saffron threads
Cooking spray
1/2 package soy chorizo (about 6 ounces)
1/2 cup chopped onion
1/2 cup chopped red bell pepper
3 garlic cloves, minced
3/4 cup uncooked Arborio rice
1/4 cup dry white wine
1/2 teaspoon paprika
1 (14.5-ounce) can diced tomatoes, drained
1 package of Tofurkey slices, chopped
1/2 cup frozen peas, thawed
2 tablespoons chopped fresh parsley

Combine broth and saffron in a small saucepan over low heat; bring to a simmer.
Remove from heat.

Heat a large nonstick skillet over medium-high heat.Coat pan with cooking spray.
Add onion and pepper to pan; cook 3 minutes. Add chorizo to pan; cook an
additional 3 minutes or until browned, stirring to crumble. Add garlic; cook 2
minutes. Add rice; cook 3 minutes, stirring constantly. Add wine and paprika;
cook 1 minute or until liquid evaporates, scraping pan to loosen browned bits.
Stir in broth mixture and tomatoes; bring to a boil. Cover, reduce heat, and
simmer 20 minutes or until rice is tender and liquid is absorbed, stirring
occasionally. Gently stir in turkey, peas, and parsley; cook 2 minutes or until
thoroughly heated.


-Bow Tie Pasta with Roasted Red Pepper Cream Sauce

You know, vegan cream sauces really are so much better than the dairy ones...
they taste great and are never too rich and gross like the regular dairy ones
can be.

1 pound uncooked farfalle (bow tie pasta)
2 teaspoons extravirgin olive oil
1/2 cup finely chopped onion
1 (12-ounce) bottle roasted red bell peppers, drained and coarsely chopped
2 teaspoons balsamic vinegar
1 cup soy half-and-half
1 tablespoon tomato paste
1/8 teaspoon ground red pepper
1 cup (4 ounces) soy parm (divided) *or* nutritional yeast
Thinly sliced fresh basil (optional)

Cook the pasta according to package directions.

Heat oil in a large skillet over medium heat. Add onion, and cook 8 minutes or
until tender, stirring frequently. Add bell peppers; cook 2 minutes or until
heated through. Increase heat to medium-high. Stir in vinegar; cook 1 minute or
until liquid evaporates. Remove from heat; cool 5 minutes. Place bell pepper
mixture in a blender; process until smooth. Return bell pepper mixture to pan;
cook over low heat until warm. Combine half-and-half and tomato paste in a small
bowl, stirring with a whisk. Stir tomato mixture into bell pepper mixture,
stirring with a whisk until well combined. Stir in ground red pepper.

Combine pasta and bell pepper mixture in a large bowl. Add 1/2 cup soy cheese or
nutritional yeast, tossing to coat. Garnish with additional soy cheese and
basil, if desired.


-Chicken Enchilada Bake with Mushroom Sauce

This is sort of like enchiladas, but easier to assemble, as it comes together
more like a lasagne.... and it's darn good!

2 poblano chiles (about 6 ounces)
2 Anaheim chiles (about 4 1/2 ounces)
1 red bell pepper
1 tablespoon olive oil
3 cups sliced cremini mushrooms (about 8 ounces)
1 1/2 cups sliced shiitake mushrooms (about 1 [3 1/2-ounce] package)
1/2 cup sliced green onions
2 garlic cloves, minced
2 tablespoons all-purpose flour
1/2 teaspoon dried rubbed sage
1/4 teaspoon ground cumin
1/4 teaspoon black pepper
1 1/4 cups un-chicken or vegetable broth
1/2 cup water
4 ounces soy cream cheese (about 1/2 cup), softened
1/2 cup (2 ounces) shredded soy cheese
1/4 cup chopped fresh cilantro
Cooking spray
9 (6-inch) corn tortillas, cut in half
2 1/4 cups chopped fake chicken or chicken-style seitan
1/4 cup (1 ounce) soy parm

Preheat broiler.

Cut the chiles and bell pepper in half lengthwise, and discard seeds and
membranes. Place chile and bell pepper halves, skin sides up, on a foil-lined
baking sheet, and flatten with hand. Broil for 5 minutes or until blackened,
turning occasionally. Place in a zip-top plastic bag, and seal. Let stand 15
minutes; peel and chop chiles and bell pepper.

Heat oil in a large nonstick skillet over medium heat. Add mushrooms, onions,
and garlic; sauté 5 minutes. Stir in flour, sage, cumin, and black pepper, and
cook 2 minutes. Stir in chopped chiles and bell pepper, broth, and water; simmer
5 minutes or until thick, stirring constantly. Stir in soy cream cheese. Remove
from heat; stir in soy cheese and cilantro.

Preheat oven to 350°.

Spoon 1 cup mushroom sauce into an 11 x 7-inch baking dish coated with cooking
spray; top with 6 tortilla halves, 3/4 cup chicken, and 1 cup sauce. Repeat
layers twice, ending with sauce. Sprinkle with soy parm. Cover and bake at 350°
for 35 minutes or until bubbly. Let stand 10 minutes.


-Chicken Picadillo

I still don't know exactly what in the heck a picadillo really is, but this sure
is flavorful! Serve with black bean and rice and / or tortillas... you can make
burrito-type things with it if you're so inclined.

1 pound chicken style seitan
2 teaspoons olive oil
1 cup chopped onion
1 1/2 teaspoons ground cumin
1/2 teaspoon salt
1/4 teaspoon ground cinnamon
3 garlic cloves, minced
1 cup bottled salsa
1/3 cup golden raisins
1/4 cup slivered almonds, toasted
1/4 cup chopped fresh cilantro
Fresh cilantro sprigs (optional)

Place seitan in a food processor; pulse until ground.

Heat oil in a large nonstick skillet over medium-high heat. Add onion, and cook
for 3 minutes, stirring occasionally. Add chicken, cumin, salt, cinnamon, and
garlic, and cook for 3 minutes or until chicken is done, stirring frequently.
Stir in salsa and raisins. Cover, reduce heat, and simmer for 5 minutes or until
thoroughly heated. Stir in almonds and cilantro. Garnish with cilantro sprigs,
if desired.


-Sausage and Veggie Pizza

I was afraid of making pizza for many years. Then I got over myself and tried 3
different pizza recipes over a 2 week period. This was my favorite one...
reminded me of the Sicilian slices I loved during my New Jersey youth.

Sauce:

Cooking spray
2 cups chopped zucchini
1/4 cup chopped onion
1 (8-ounce) package mushrooms, sliced
1/4 cup white wine
1/8 teaspoon black pepper
2 cups garlic-and-onion pasta sauce
8 ounces soy sausage (I used Tofurkey Italian style links, chopped up)

Dough:

2 teaspoons honey or sugar
1 package active dry yeast (about 2 1/4 teaspoons)
1 cup warm water (100° to 110°)
2 1/2 cups all-purpose flour
1 tablespoon yellow cornmeal
1/2 teaspoon salt
2 teaspoons olive oil

Remaining ingredients:

1 1/2 cups (6 ounces) shredded soy mozzarella
1/2 cup (2 ounces) soy parm

To prepare sauce, heat a large saucepan over medium-high heat. Coat pan with
cooking spray. Add zucchini, onion, mushrooms and sausage to pan; sauté 7
minutes or until vegetables are lightly browned. Add wine and pepper; cook 1
minute or until liquid almost evaporates. Stir in sauce. Remove from heat.

To prepare dough, dissolve honey and yeast in 1 cup warm water in a large bowl;
let stand 5 minutes. Lightly spoon flour into dry measuring cups; level with a
knife.  Add 2 1/4 cups flour, cornmeal, and salt to yeast mixture; stir until a
soft dough forms. Turn dough out onto a lightly floured surface. Knead until
smooth and elastic (about 6 minutes); add enough of remaining flour, 1
tablespoon at a time, to prevent dough from sticking to hands (dough will feel
sticky). Place dough in a large bowl coated with cooking spray, turning to coat
top. Cover and let rise in a warm place (85°), free from drafts, 45 minutes or
until doubled in size. (Gently press two fingers into dough. If indentation
remains, dough has risen enough.)

Position one oven rack in the middle setting. Position another rack in the
lowest setting. Preheat oven to 475°.

Brush a 13 x 9-inch baking pan with oil. Turn dough into pan. Gently press dough
into pan and up the sides of the pan. Lightly spray surface of dough with
cooking spray. Cover with plastic wrap; let stand for 5 minutes. Remove plastic
wrap; discard. Spoon sauce mixture into crust. Bake on the bottom rack at 475°
for 20 minutes.  Remove from oven.

Combine cheeses; sprinkle evenly over sauce. Bake on middle rack an additional
15 minutes or until crust is golden brown and cheese melts. Cool 10 minutes on a
wire rack. Cut into 6 squares.


=Desserts
-Outrageous Brownies

No one has ever guessed that these are vegan!

1 1/3 cups flour
1/2 tsp baking soda
1/2 cup softened margarine
1 cup sugar
3 tbls oil
1 12.3 oz package firm silken tofu
1/3 cup unsweetened cocoa powder
1 tsp vanilla extract
2 cups semi-sweet chocolate chips

Preheat oven to 350.  Combine flour and baking soda and set aside.  Combine
margarine, sugar and oil in a food processor and process 2 minutes or until
light and fluffy. Add tofu and process for 2 minutes longer. Add cocoa powder
and vanilla and process for a short time. Slowly add the dry mixture, processing
periodically. Pour into a bowl and add chocolate chips.  Pour batter into a
lightly oiled 9 X 12 inch baking pan. Bake for 25 minutes; check at 20 minutes.

-Rice Pudding

It smells SO GOOD when it is baking, it will drive you out of your mind!

1/2 cup white rice
4 cups soy milk
2 tsp vanilla extract
1 tsp ground cinnamon
Dash of nutmeg
1/4 cup sugar

Preheat oven to 275. Mix all ingredients in a bowl and place in a 1 1/2 quart
lightly oiled overproof dish. Bake covered for 3 hours, or until the pudding
sets.

-Peanut Butter Cups

Never again will you miss the Reese's kind!

1/2 cup margarine
3/4 cup peanut butter
3/4 cup graham cracker crumbs
1/4 cup sugar
1 cup chocolate chips
1/4 cup soy milk
12 cupcake liners

Melt margarine in a small saucepan. Once melted, stir in the peanut butter,
cracker crumbs, and sugar. Spoon about 2 tbsps into muffin tins lined with paper
cupcake liners (the liners are a must). Let them cool and harden a bit.  In a
small saucepan, melt together the choocolate chips and soy milk until completely
melted. Spoon over the top of the peanut butter cups. Let set in the fridge for
several hours before serving.

-Carrot Cake

I've searched far and wide for a good carrot cake recipe that has thick cream
cheese frosting, and this is by far the winner!

Carrot Cake

3/4 cup sugar
1/2 cup brown sugar
2 cups flour
1 tsp salt
1 tsp cinnamon
1 tsp baking powder
1 tsp baking soda
3 cups finely shredded carrots
3/4 cup vegetable oil
3/4 cup apple sauce
2 tsp vanilla
4 egg substitutes (Ener-G)
1/2 cup chopped nuts (optional)

Cream Cheese Frosting

3 oz Better Than Cream Cheese
1/4 cup margarine
1 tsp vanilla
1 & 1/2 cups powdered sugar


Cake

Grease and flour a 10" X 9" or square cake pan.  Stir together dry ingredients.
Mix in the carrots, egg subs, oil, apple sauce, and vanilla.  Beat about 2 - 3
minutes, until well mixed.  Stir in the nuts, if used.  Bake at 350 F for about
50 - 60 minutes, or until a toothpick comes out clean.  Cool on a wire rack.
Frost when cool.

Frosting

Once the BTCC is at room temperature, mix all ingredients together. Frost cake.


-Spiced Streusel Apple Pie

I have a bit of a thing for strussel these days, and this is a winner for sure!

Streusel

2/3 cup nuts (I'd personally use almonds or hazelnuts)
1/2 cup (packed) golden brown sugar
1/4 cup yellow cornmeal
1/4 cup all purpose flour
3/4 teaspoon ground cinnamon
1/2 teaspoon ground nutmeg
5 tablespoons chilled soymarg, cut into small pieces

Filling

2 1/4 pounds Granny Smith apples, peeled, cored, and cut into 1/2-inch-thick wedges
1/2 cup soy sour cream *or* 1 container of plain soy yogurt
1/4 cup sugar
2 tablespoons all purpose flour
1 1/2 teaspoons ground cinnamon
3/4 teaspoon ground nutmeg
1/8 teaspoon ground cloves

1 prepared pie crust

For streusel: Combine nuts, brown sugar, cornmeal, flour, cinnamon and nutmeg in
processor. Using on/off turns, process until nuts are finely chopped. Add
soymarg and process until small moist clumps form. (Can be prepared 1 day ahead.
Cover and refrigerate.)

For filling: Position rack in center of oven and preheat to 375°F. Toss apples
with sour cream or yogurt in large bowl to coat. Mix sugar, flour, cinnamon,
nutmeg and cloves in small bowl. Sprinkle mixture over apples and toss to coat.

Transfer filling to prepared crust. Sprinkle streusel over apples, covering
completely. Bake pie until apples are tender and streusel is golden, tenting pie
with foil if streusel browns too quickly, about 1 hour. Transfer pie to rack and
cool slightly.


-Chocolate and Peanut Butter Cake

This is a yummy cake for kids and adults alike

2 1/4 cups all purpose flour
2 cups (packed) golden brown sugar
1 cup creamy peanut butter
1/2 cup (1 stick) unsalted soy marg, room temperature
egg replacer = 3 eggs
1 cup soy milk
1 teaspoon vanilla extract
1 teaspoon baking powder
1/2 teaspoon baking soda
1 12-ounce package semisweet chocolate chips (2 cups)

Preheat oven to 350°F. Grease a 13x9x2-inch metal baking pan. Combine first 4
ingredients in large bowl. Using electric mixer, beat on low speed until it is
blended and crumbly. Transfer 1 cup, lightly packed, to small bowl and reserve.
Add egg replacer, milk, vanilla, baking powder, and baking soda to remaining mix
in large bowl. Beat at low speed until evenly moist. Increase speed to medium
and beat until well blended, scraping bowl occasionally, about 3 minutes.  Stir
in 1 cup chips. Transfer batter to prepared pan. Sprinkle with reserved 1 cup
mix and remaining 1 cup chips.

Bake cake until tester inserted into center comes out clean, about 35 minutes.
Cool cake in pan on rack.


-Peach Tart

I had never before made any kind of peach pie or tart, and I was suprised at how
easy this was... at at how smooth and delicious it turned out!


1 Frozen Pie Crust (most are vegan)

3/4 cup slivered blanched almonds
1/3 cup sugar
3 tablespoons amaretto
2 tablespoons (1/4 stick) soy marg
egg replacer = 1 egg

4 - 5 ripe peaches
1/2 cup peach or apricot preserves

Pre-bake pie crust according to package directions. Let cool slightly on a rack.
Set over temperature to 400 degrees.

Finely grind slivered almonds in processor. Add remaining 1 tablespoon flour,
sugar, 2 tablespoons amaretto and soy marg and puree. Add egg replacer and
process until well blended. Pour into crust. Bake until filling begins to brown
and is springy to touch, about 15 minutes. Cool on rack. (Can be prepared 6
hours ahead. Let stand at room temperature.)

If your peaches are very ripe, you can skip this part, but if not, it helps to
blanch them first to easily remove the skins. To do this, bring medium pot of
water to boil. Add peaches and blanch 30 seconds. Transfer to bowl of cold
water, using slotted spoon.

Peel peaches. Cut into slices. Drain well.

Combine preserves and 1 tablespoon amaretto in heavy small saucepan. Bring to
boil, stirring to melt preserves. Boil until slightly thickened, about 30
seconds. Brush some preserves over tart filling. Arrange peaches atop preserves
in concentric circles, overlapping slices. Brush with remaining preserves. Can
be prepared 3 hours ahead. Store at room temperature.)

This tart does not age very well... it was a bit strange just by the following
afternoon, so I'd plan to eat the whole thing on the day that you make it!

.

-Vegan Truffles

These are SO easy to make and ridiculously rich and delicious!

8 ounces vegan cream cheese
2 cups powered sugar
2 cups chocolate chips
optional stuff - more chocolate chips or almond bark to coat, chopped nuts,
	shredded coconut, cocoa powder, flavored liqueur

Blend vegan cream cheese and powered sugar in a food processor, slowly adding
the sugar to the cream cheese. Melt the chocolate chips on the stove and add the
melted chips to the cream cheese mixture, blending until it's all mixed in. If
you want,you can add a tablespoon or more of flavored liqueur (hazelnut,
peppermint, etc.) to the mixture and blend a little bit longer.

Put the mixture in the refrigerator for about an hour and a half - 2 hours

Roll the mixture with your hands into little balls. Roll the balls into the
topping of your choice..... chopped nuts, shredded coconut, cocoa powder, etc.
You can also melt some more chocolate chips or almond bark and dip the truffles
in that and refrigerate, so that they have a hard "coat" over them

Store them in the refrigerater until you are ready to eat them.


-Diana's Chocolate Caramel Bars

Diana was very insistent that we make these at my house, and now I understand
why! They are quick and easy, and vegan caramel is hard to come by!


Saltines (20 or so)
12 oz. chocolate chips
1 - 2 sticks of soy marg *
1 cup brown sugar
1/2 cup chopped nuts (I used almonds)

I've made these both with 1 stick of marg and with 2 sticks. Some people find
the 2 sticks to be too greasy (not to mention too junky!) They still taste great
with use 1 stick, they just won't be as over the top gooey.

Foil a 9 X 14 (or about that size) baking pan. Place one layer of the saltines
on the bottom.

Melt marg and brown sugar on stove, stirring constantly. Bring to a boil, and
boil for 3 minutes. Pour this over the saltines.

Bake at 400 degrees for 5 - 7 minutes, until golden brown. Pour chocolate chips
over it, and place it back in the oven for a minute or so until the chips are
melted.  Spread chocolate with a knife. Sprinkle with nuts.

Let it cool and harden in the fridge overnight.

-Pumpkin Bourbon Cheesecake

This is a very very very impressive cake! It's delicious and beautiful and a
wonderful winter dessert. However, be warned... the ingredients are not cheap
and it takes a while to make.... From start to eat, it takes a minimum or 11
hours... but don't let that scare you because most of that time will be baking
or chilling. Make this when you want to make a great impression on someone!

For crust

3/4 cup graham cracker crumbs (from five 4 3/4- by 2 1/4-inch crackers)
1/2 cup pecans (1 3/4 oz), finely chopped
1/4 cup packed light brown sugar
1/4 cup granulated sugar
1/2 stick (1/4 cup) marg, melted and cooled

For filling

1 1/2 cups canned solid-pack pumpkin
egg replacer = 3 eggs
1/2 cup packed light brown sugar
2 tablespoons soy creamer
1 teaspoon vanilla
1 tablespoon bourbon liqueur or bourbon (optional)
1/2 cup granulated sugar
1 tablespoon cornstarch
1 1/2 teaspoons cinnamon
1/2 teaspoon freshly grated nutmeg
1/2 teaspoon ground ginger
1/2 teaspoon salt
3 (8-oz) packages Tofutti Better Than Cream Cheese, at room temperature

For topping

2 cups Tofutti sour cream (20 oz)
2 tablespoons granulated sugar
1 tablespoon bourbon liqueur or bourbon (optional)

Make crust: Invert bottom of a 9-inch springform pan (to create flat bottom,
which will make it easier to remove cake from pan), then lock on side and
butter pan. Stir together crumbs, pecans, sugars, and butter in a bowl until
combined well. Press crumb mixture evenly onto bottom and 1/2 inch up side of
pan, then chill crust, 1 hour.

Make filling and bake cheesecake: Put oven rack in middle position and Preheat
oven to 350°F. Whisk together pumpkin, eggs, brown sugar, cream, vanilla, and
liqueur (if using) in a bowl until combined. Stir together granulated sugar,
cornstarch, cinnamon, nutmeg, ginger, and salt in large bowl. Add cream cheese
and beat with an electric mixer at high speed until creamy and smooth, about
3 minutes. Reduce speed to medium, then add pumpkin mixture and beat until
smooth. Pour filling into crust, smoothing top, then put springform pan in a
shallow baking pan (in case springform leaks). Bake until center is just set, 50
to 60 minutes. Transfer to rack and cool 5 minutes. (Leave oven on.)

Make topping: Whisk together sour cream, sugar, and liqueur (if using) in a
bowl, then spread on top of cheesecake and bake 5 minutes.

Cool cheesecake completely in pan on rack, about 3 hours. Chill, covered, until
cold, at least 4 hours.

Remove side of pan and bring to room temperature before serving.


-Bananas Foster

Have *you* ever had the urge to make a flaming dessert? I did! I was very
excited about this one! It is VERY easy to make, all of the ingredients are
things that you likely already have around the kitchen and it is ABSOLUTELY
AMAZING! This is easily one of the most superior desserts I have ever made, and
it's definitely the easiest!

2 bananas, ripe but still firm
1/2 cup soy marg
2 tbsp brown sugar
1 1/2 tsp vanilla extract
1/4 cup brandy
vanilla soy ice cream

Cut bananas into quarters but cutting in half lengthwise and crosswise.

Melt soy marg in a skillet over meduim heat. Stir in brown sugar. After it
melts, add bananas and turn them to coat in the sugar mixture. Cook them for
about 5 minutes.  Add vanilla extract and remove from heat.

Add the brandy, and light it on fire with a long match. It will flame for 30
seconds, so now is the time to bring it out and impress your guests.

Serve in a bowl with the vanilla soy ice cream.


-Raspberry Cheesecake Bars

These are *superb*! They are great to make if you have a cheesecake craving, but
you don't have the full day (or the amount of money) that it takes to make a
proper vegan cheesecake.

1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour
3/4 teaspoon salt
3 1/2 tablespoons soy marg, melted
1 cup packed brown sugar
1 1/2 teaspoons vanilla extract, divided
egg replacer = 3 eggs
1/2 cup granulated sugar
1/2 cup vegan sour cream or plain soy yogurt
1 teaspoon grated lemon rind
1 tablespoon fresh lemon juice
1 (8-ounce) package Tofutti Better Than Cream Cheese
Cooking spray
1 1/2 cups fresh raspberries


Preheat oven to 350°.

Combine flour and salt, stirring with a whisk. Combine marg, brown sugar, 1
teaspoon vanilla, and egg replacer in a medium bowl, stirring with a whisk until
smooth. Add flour mixture to marg mixture; stir just until moist.

Place 1/2 teaspoon vanilla, granulated sugar, and next 4 ingredients (through
cream cheese) in a large bowl; beat with a mixer at high speed until fluffy.

Line a 13 x 9-inch baking pan with foil that extends 1 inch beyond sides; coat
foil with cooking spray. Spread half of batter into pan. Pour cream cheese
mixture over batter in pan, and spread evenly over batter. Sprinkle with
raspberries. Drop remaining batter by tablespoonfuls over raspberries. Swirl
batter, cream cheese mixture, and raspberries together with a knife.

Bake at 350° for 45 minutes or until a wooden pick inserted in center comes out
clean. Cool completely on wire rack. Remove from pan by lifting foil. Remove
foil; cut into bars.


-Mark's Birthday Cake

My beau asked for a yellow cake with chocolate frosting for his birthday. I
veganized a recipe and came up with a cake that taught a whole room full of
non-vegans not to be wary of a vegan cake. UPDATE: He asked for the same cake
again for his next birthday.... this time, I turned it into a layer cake, and
you can do that too. Just put the batter into 2 8-inch pans, and decrease the
baking time by about 5 minutes. I made 150% of the icing recipe to cover the
layer cake, but that was probably excessive... it would have been OK with the
amount in the recipe.

Cake:

Cooking spray
1 tablespoon all-purpose flour
1/2 cup soy marg, melted
1 (8-ounce) carton soy sour cream
1 1/2 cups granulated sugar
2 teaspoons vanilla extract
egg replacer = 4 eggs
2 cups all-purpose flour
1 teaspoon baking soda
1/2 teaspoon salt
3/4 cup soy creamer mixed with 1 tsp apple cider vinegar (my approximation of buttermilk)

Frosting:

1/2 cup (4 ounces) Tofutti Better Than Cream Cheese, softened
1/4 cup soy marg, softened
1 teaspoon vanilla extract
1/3 cup unsweetened cocoa
1 to 2 tablespoons soy creamer
1/8 teaspoon salt
3 cups powdered sugar, divided


Preheat oven to 350°.

To prepare cake, coat bottom of a 13 x 9-inch baking pan with cooking spray (do
not coat sides of pan); line bottom of pan with wax paper. Coat wax paper
with cooking spray; dust with 1 tablespoon flour. Set aside. *Or* you can bake
the cake in a springform pane, which is what I did.... this way, you don't have
to worry about removing it from the pan and having it get stuck.

Combine 1/2 cup marg and soy sour cream in a large bowl, stirring with a whisk
until well blended. Add granulated sugar and 2 teaspoons vanilla. Beat with a
mixer at medium speed 3 minutes or until well blended. Add egg replacer; beat 2
minutes or until well blended. Lightly spoon 2 cups flour into dry measuring
cups; level with a knife. Combine 2 cups flour, baking soda, and 1/2 teaspoon
salt, stirring well with a whisk. Add flour mixture and "buttermilk" alternately
to sugar mixture, beginning and ending with flour mixture; mix after each
addition.

Pour batter into prepared pan. Sharply tap pan once on counter to remove air
bubbles. Bake at 350° for 30 minutes or until a wooden pick inserted in center
comes out clean. Cool in pan 10 minutes on a wire rack; remove from pan.
Carefully peel off wax paper; cool completely on wire rack.

To prepare frosting, place the cream cheese, 1/4 cup soy marg, and 1 teaspoon
vanilla in a large bowl; beat with a mixer at high speed until fluffy. Add
cocoa, creamer, and 1/8 teaspoon salt; beat at low speed until well blended.
Gradually add 1 1/2 cups powdered sugar; beat at low speed until creamy.
Gradually add remaining 1 1/2 cups powdered sugar. Place cake on a serving
platter. Spread frosting over top and sides of cake. Store cake loosely covered
in the refrigerator.


-Marbled Brownies

These brownies are *extremely* rich and chocolatey, and they are apparently
low-calorie as well. But I assure you, no one would EVER guess these are either
vegan or low-calorie!

2/3 cup all-purpose flour
1/2 cup granulated sweetener
1 tsp. baking powder
1/4 cup soy marg, at room temperature
egg replacer = 2 eggs
2 tsp. vanilla extract
1/2 cup unsweetened applesauce
1/2 cup white chocolate chips
1/2 cup cocoa powder
1/2 cup chocolate chips

Preheat oven to 350F. Grease a 8- or 9-inch square cake pan.

Stir together flour, sweetener and baking powder in bowl. Beat together marg,
egg replacer and vanilla in separate bowl until marg is broken into little
pieces. Add applesauce, and stir until blended. Fold in flour mixture until
moistened. Fold in white chocolate. Measure out 1/2 cup of mixture, and drop by
spoonfuls into prepared pan.

Fold cocoa powder and chocolate chips into remaining batter. Gently spoon
chocolate batter over white batter. Batter is thick, so smooth out surface.

Bake 40 minutes, or until toothpick inserted into center comes out clean. Cool
before cutting into squares.


-Macadamia Blondies with Caramel-Maple Topping

I know macadamia nuts are expensive... but don't let that stop you! I haven't
been able to stop thinking about these since I made them several weeks ago.

FOR THE BLONDIES:

2 3/4 cups all-purpose flour
1 tsp baking powder
1 tsp baking soda
1/2 tsp salt
6 ozs. silken tofu
1/4 cup soy milk
1/3 cup oil
2 cups sugar
2 tbsp vanilla extract
1 1/4 cups raw macadamias, partially chopped and partially ground

FOR THE TOPPING:

1/4 cup soy marg
2 tbsp brown sugar
1/4 cup maple syrup
1 cup raw macadamia nuts, coarsely chopped

Preheat oven to 350F. Grease a 9 X 13 inch pan.

In a blender or food processor, blend the tofu and soy milk until smooth. Add
the oil, sugar and vanilla dn blend again. Combine this with the dry ingredients
in a mixing bowl and mix well. Fold in the nuts. The dough will be think. Spread
into the baking pan and bake for 25 minutes.

Prepare the topping: Mix all ingredients except for the nuts in a saucepan. Heat
until sugar dissolves. Increase heat and bring to boil for 1 minute. Stir in
nuts and remove from heat.

Remove blondies from over, pour topping on them, and bake for 10 more minutes.
Let cool completely before serving.


-Chocolate Cheesecake

Yes, it terribly unhealthy (although not compared to a conventional
cheesecake!), it takes a bit of time and effort to make and it ain't cheap
(I mean, you'll spend at least $10 on the soy cream cheese alone), but HOLY MOLY
does it come out rich and thick and decadent!

FOR THE CRUST:

Oreo styled chocolate wafer cookies (I used Newman's Own Tops and Bottoms)
2 tablespoons sugar
2 tablespoons soy marg, melted
Cooking spray

FOR CAKE:

1/2 cup Dutch process cocoa
1/4 cup soy milk
3 ounces semisweet chocolate chips, melted
5 (8-ounce) containers soy cream cheese, softened (I used Tofutti Better Than Cream Cheese)
1 1/2 cups sugar
3 tablespoons all-purpose flour
2 teaspoons vanilla extract
egg replacer = 4 eggs

FOR GARNISH:

Sliced almonds, toasted

Preheat oven to 325°.

Put chocolate wafers into a sealed plactis bag, and crush with a rolling pin to
make crumbs. You need to make a cup of crumbs. (If you're using the Newman's Own
wafers that I used, it takes 2 out of the 3 rows of wafers in the box to equal a
cup a crumbs).

To prepare crust, combine crumbs, sugar and marg; toss with a fork until moist.
Press into bottom of a 9-inch springform pan coated with cooking spray.

To prepare the filling, combine cocoa, soy milk, and chocolate, and stir well
with a whisk. Beat cheeses at high speed of a mixer until smooth. Add 1 1/2 cups
sugar, flour, and vanilla; beat well. Add chocolate mixture; beat well. Add egg
replacer, and beat well. Pour cheese mixture into prepared pan; bake at 325° for
1 hour and 10 minutes or until almost set. Cheesecake is done when the center
barely moves when the pan is touched. Remove cheesecake from oven, and run a
knife around outside edge.  Cool to room temperature. Cover and chill for at
least 8 hours. Sprinkle with almonds.


-Chocolate-Banana Ganache With Fruit

This is a beautiful dessert! If you have any ganache left over, chill it and it
makes a very rich and delicious chocolate banana pudding. You can also vary the
kinds of fruit you use according to season and your own desire.

3 medium bananas
3/4 cup coconut milk
3/4 cup chocolate chips
1/3 cup maple syrup
3/4 tsp. vanilla extract
3 cups strawberries, stemmed and quartered
3 kiwis, peeled, halved crosswise and sliced
2 mangoes, peeled and cut into 1 inch pieces
1/4 cup dried coconut, optional

Preheat oven to 350° Bake whole unpeeled bananas 15 minutes or until black and
soft. Cut tips and squeeze into a food processor.

Bring coconut milk to a boil in a saucepan. Remove from heat and stir in
chocolate chips. Let stand 3 minutes, or until chocolate has melted. Whisk in
syrup and vanilla. Puree chocolate mixture with bananas in processor until
smooth.

Divide fruit among 6 bowls and drizzle with ganache. Sprinkle with coconut, if
desired.


=Breads
-Soy Milk Biscuits

Just what I need to help me when I'm craving the good ol' days in NC... but the
Waffle House never made them THIS good!

2 cups all-purpose flour
3 tsp baking powder
3/4 tsp salt
6 tbls soy margarine
3/4 cup soymilk

Preheat oven to 425. Grease a baking sheet Sift flour, baking powder and salt
together in a large mixing bowl. Add the margarine to the flour mixture until it
looks like coarse crumbs. Stir in the soy milk and form the dough into a ball.
On a floured surface, roll out the dough about 2 inches thick. Cut into 2 inch
rounds with a cookie cutter.  Place on sheet and bake for 15 minutes, until
slightly brown.

-Sweet Potato Corn Bread

This vegan version is the best corn bread ever!

1 cup flour
1 tsp baking powder
1/2 tsp baking soda
1/2 tsp salt
1/8 tsp allspice
1/2 cup cornmeal
1 cup sweet potatoes, cooked and mashed
4 tbsp oil
1/4 cup sweetener
egg replacer, equal to 2 eggs
1/2 cup sour soy milk (soy milk + 1/2 tbsp vinegar)

Preheat oven to 375. In a large bowl, combine flour, baking powder, baking
soda.salt and allspice. Stir in the cornmeal. Add the remaining ingredients and
mix together.  Spoon into a lightly oiled square or round loaf pane and bake for
30 minutes.

-Vegan Doughnuts

I was missing Krispy Kremes, so we came up with this as a way to fulfill my
doughnut needs!

1 package active dry yeast (2 1/4 tsp)
1 cup warm water (110 degrees)
1/4 cup vegetable shortening
1/2 cup sugar
1/3 cup soy milk, warmed
Egg replacer equilivent to 2 eggs
4 cups all-purpose flour
1/2 tsp salt
1 1/4 tsp mace
Oil for frying
Glaze:
2 cups confectioners' sugar
1/2 cup hot water

Dissolve the yeast in 1/2 cup of warm water and let the mixture stand for 5
minutes. In a small saucepan, bring the remaining water to a boil. Add the
shortening and sugar and stir until the shortening has melted and the sugar has
dissolved. Remove the pan from heat and LET IT COOL (very important!!!). When it
is cooled, add the yeast and warm soy milk. Stir in the egg replacer and 2 cups
of flour. Beat well. Add 2 more cups of flour and the salt and mace. Mix well.
Add the flour slowly. Only add enough to make a soft and manageable dough. Turn
the dough onto a loightly floured board and knead until smooth and elastic.
Place the dough in a large greased bowl, cover and let it rise until doubled in
bulk. (about an hour).  Punch the dough down. On a lightly floured surface roll
it out to 1/2 inch thickness. Cut out doughnuts with a 2 inch dutter. Place the
doughnuts on waxed paper or a greased baking sheet about 1 inch apart. Make
holes in 'em with your finger if you feel the need. Let them rise for 1 hour.

Heat the oil to 370 degrees in a skillet or deep fryer. Fry 3 doughnuts at a
time, until gloden on eahc side. Drain on paper towels. Prepare the glaze or
roll in sugar to coat.

To make the glaze, mix the ingredients untill smooth in a shallow bowl. While
the doughnuts are hot, coat all sides in the glaze.


-Annie's Rosemary and Garlic Bread

I don't know who Annie is, but I'm sure glad I got ahold of her bread recipe!

3 cups bread flour (maybe a bit more if needed for dough consistancy)
1/3 cup olive oil
1 packet active yeast (2 1/4 tsp)
1 1/2 cup lukewarm water (110 degrees)
1/4 chopped fresh rosemary
3 - 6 cloves minced garlic
1 tsp salt
2 tsp kosher salt (or sea salt)
1 tbsp sugar

Mix together the water, yeast, sugar and half of the rosemary. Add 1 tsp salt to
the flour, then add the flour and salt to the yeast mixture, slowly, until the
dough is able to form a ball. Knead on a well floured board or table for 10
minutes. Place dough in a well oiled bowl, cover, and let sit in a warm place
until it doubles in size (about an hour).  Mix together the oil, rosemary and
garlic. Punch dough down, and knead a few times to make it easy to handle. Shape
dough into 2 loaves and place several inches apart on a baking sheet. Score the
loaves and pour the oil mixture on top of them. Sprinkle each loaf with the
kosher salt. Allow to rise for 30 minutes.  Pre-heat oven to 350. Bake for 15
minutes, until golden. Tip: place a bowl of cold water in the oven to make it
steamy and keep things moist.

-Plum Streusel Coffeecake

The first words out of my mouth after my first bite of this was "Good mother of
god!"... and I'm an atheist!

For streusel:
1/2 cup all-purpose flour
1/2 cup firmly packed light brown sugar
1/2 cup hazelnuts
3/4 stick (6 tablespoons) soymarg
1 teaspoon cinnamon
1/4 teaspoon nutmeg

For cake batter:
1 stick (1/2 cup) soymarg, softened
3/4 cup granulated sugar
egg replacer = 2 eggs
1 teaspoon vanilla
1 1/4 cups all-purpose flour
1 teaspoon baking powder
1/2 teaspoon salt

6 plums, peeled and sliced

Preheat oven to 350°F. and butter and flour a 9-inch round or square baking pan
at least 2 inches deep.

Make streusel: In a food processor pulse together streusel ingredients until
combined well and crumbly.

Make cake batter: In a bowl with an electric mixer beat butter with sugar until
light and fluffy and add egg replacer and vanilla. Sift in flour with baking
powder and salt and beat until just combined.

Spread cake batter in pan, smoothing top, and arrange plum slices over it in
slightly overlapping concentric circles. Sprinkle streusel over plum slices and
bake cake in middle of oven for 50 minutes, .

-Caribbean Banana Bread

All I can say here is MMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMM!

1 cup natural sugar
1/4 cup vegan margarine, softened
egg replacer equaling 2 eggs
1 1/2 cup mashed ripe bananas,3-4
1/3 cup water
2/3 cup whole wheat flour
1 cup unbleached white flour
1 teaspoon baking soda
1/2 teaspoon salt
1/4 teaspoon baking powder
1 teaspoon cinnamon
1/4 cup coconut

Preheat oven to 350. In a large bowl, mix sugar and margarine. Add bananas and
water. Prepare the binding powder according to the directions given. Add to wet
mixture.  Stir in the remaining ingredients, except the coconut,just until
moistened. Fold in coconut. Oil bottom only of a 9x5x3 loaf pan. Pour batter
into pan. Bake for about 1 hour or until toothpick inserted comes out clean.
Cool 5 minutes. Loosen sides form pan; remove loaf.Cool completely.

-Apple Streusel Muffins

I just keep going back to this recipe... I've made it more times than any other
muffins in my life.

1/4 cup brown sugar
1/2 tsp cinnamon
1/2 tsp nutmeg
1 3/4 cup flour
1/2 cup oat bran
1/2 cup sugar
1 tbsp baking powder
1 tsp cinnamon
1/4 tsp salt
1 apple, finely chopped
1 cup soy milk
1/4 cup water
1/4 cup olive oil
egg replacer, equal to 2 eggs

Preheat oven to 400 F. Mix together the first 3 ingredients. Set Aside. In a
large bowl, mix together the dry ingredients. Add the remaining ingredients.
Stir until just mixed. Sppon into lightly oiled muffin tins and sprinkle with
the cinnamon/brown sugar mixture. Bake for 12-15 minutes.

-Olive and Sundried Tomato Focaccia Bread

This is one of the best things I have ever made... TRY IT!

2 tsp dry active yeast
1 1/2 cups warm water
1 tsp dry sweetener
3 cups flour
1 tsp salt
1 1/2 tsp dried rosemary (or 1 tbsp fresh)
1 1/2 tsp dried oregano (or 1 tbsp fresh)
1 tsp sea salt
1/2 tsp black pepper
2 tsp olive oil
1/2 cup kalmata olives, chopped
1/2 cup sundried tomatoes, rehydrated and chopped

In a large bowl, stir together the yeast, warm water and sweetener. Let sit for
10 minutes. Stir in flour and salt until well combined. On a lightly floured
surface, knead dough for 6 - 8 minutes. Tranfer dough to a large, lightly oiled
bowl. Cover with a cloth and let rise in a warm place until doubled in size,
approx 1 - 1 1/2 hour.

Preheat oven to 400. In a small bowl, mix together the rosemary, oregano, salt
and pepper. Set aside. Punch down dough and roll out to form a rectangle.
Place on a lightly oiled cookie sheet and let rise for 30 minutes. Dimple
surface of dough all over with fingertips and brush surface with olive oil.
Sprinkle rosemary mixture evenly over dough and top with olives and sundried
tomatoes. Bake 15 - 20 minutes or until the edge is browned.

-Almond Coconut Muffins

These muffins are so moist, delicious and lovely!

1 1/2 cups flour
1 cup shredded coconut
1/2 cup sugar
1 1/2 tsp baking powder
1/2 tsp baking soda
1/4 tsp salt
3/4 cup coconut milk
egg replacer = 2 eggs
1/4 cup olive oil
1 tsp vanilla extract
zest of 1 small orange
1/3 cup dry roasted almonds, chopped

Preheat oven to 400. In a large bowl, stir together dry ingredients. Addre
maining ingredients and stir until just mixed. Spoon into muffin tins (either
lightly oiled or with paper liners) and bake for 12 - 15 minutes. Makes 12
muffins.

-Pumpkin Bread

This is the best pumpkin bread I have ever eaten! Definitely try some hot from
the oven, with a little soy marg spread on it!

This recipe makes 2 loaves, but it's simple to just make half of it if you don't
need 2 loaves... of course, I think you should give the second loaf away to
someone and brighten their whole week. :-)

1 cup sugar
1 cup brown sugar
1/2 cup vegetable oil
1/2 cup applesauce
egg replacer = 3 eggs
1 16-ounce can pumpkin
1 1/2 cups all purpose flour
1 1/2 cups whole wheat flour
1 teaspoon ground cloves
1 teaspoon ground cinnamon
1 teaspoon ground nutmeg
1 teaspoon baking soda
1/2 teaspoon salt
1/2 teaspoon baking powder
1 cup chocolate chips
1 cup coarsely chopped walnuts (optional)

Preheat oven to 350.

Mix together sugars, oil, applesauce, egg replacer and pumpkin. Sift together
flours, spices, baking soda, salt and baking powder. Mix the pumpkin mixture
into the flour mixture. Mix in chocolate chips and walnuts.

Butter and flour two 9x5x3-inch loaf pans.

Bake about 1 hour and 15 minutes, until knife comes out clean. Let cool 10
minutes, then remove from pan and let cool on a wire rack.

=Stuff you pour on other stuff
-Marinara Sauce

A nice sauce for all of your pasta needs!

1/2 cup water
1 chopped onion
1 chopped green pepper
1 chopped carrot
2 cloves garlic, crushed
1/4 cup chopped fresh parsley
28 oz. can of tomatoes
1/2 cup chopped fresh basil
2 tbls chopped fresh oregano
1 tsb salt
1/4 tsp ground black pepper

Simmer the onion, green pepper, garlic, carrot and parsley in the water until
almost tender Add the rest of the ingredients and simmer for 20 minutes. Cool
and blend until smooth in a food processor or blender.

-Tofu Mayonnaise

I like this stuff better than the real stuff.. then again, I'm not really one
for condiments...

1 (12.3 oz) pkg extra-firm silken tofu
2 tbls apple cider vinegar or lemon juice
1/2 tsp salt
1 tsp mustard
1/2 tsp onion powder
1 tbsp dry sweetner of your choice

Place all ingredients in a blender. Blend until smooth. It will keep for 2 weeks
in the refrigerator.

-Worcestershire Sauce

Without the anchovies, of course!

1/2 cup cider vinegar
2 tbsp Braggs
2 tsp water
1/4 tsp mustard powder
1/4 tsp onion powder
1/4 tsp ground ginger
1/4 tsp garlic granules
1/8 tsp pepper
1/8 tsp cinnamon
1 tsp sugar

Combine all ingredients in a soucepan over meduim-high heat. Bring to boil,
reduce heat, and simmer for a minute, stirring constantly. Set aside to cool.
Store in refrigerator in a clean container with a tight fitting lid.

-The Best Gravy Ever

No, really... this is the best gravy ever! I've seriously been known to quadruple
this recipe to make sure that I have lots and lots of gravy to eat!

2 cups "chicken" broth (I like the Imagine Foods one that comes in the carton), boiling
2 tbls vegetable oil
3 tbls nutritional yeast
1 vegetable boullon cube
1 cup diced fresk mushrooms
onion salt to taste
Unbleached all-purpose flour

In a large saucepan, simmer all the ingredients except the flour for
approximately 5 minutes. Slowly add the flour (tablespoon by tablespoon),
whisking after each addition, until desired thickness is reached.

-Amazing Vegan Sauce

Serve this warm over baked potatoes or veggies, or serve it cold as a salad
dressing. It's so good!

1 lb firm tofu
3/4 cup avocado or almond oil
1/4 cup Bragg's
1/2 tbs tamari
3/4 cup water
1/4 tsp basil
1/8 tsp granulated garlic
2 tbs nutritional yeast
1/4 tsp salt
1 1/2 tsp lemon juice
1/4 tsp spike
Blend it all up in a blender! That is all!

-Grill Goddess Sauce

If you marinate tofu in this before grilling, it will have magical results. Also
works great to marinate mushrooms.

1/3 cup brown rice syrup
1/3 cup water
1/2 soy sauce
1/2 cup apple cider vinegar
1/2 oil
1/4 cup crushed garlic
2 tbsp cornstarch, mixed with 1/4 cup water

Mix all ingredients well together. If you're storing it for later, you don't
have to refrigerate it.

-Ginger-Shiitake Cream Sauce

I've had my biggest success using this over the fake fish patties you can get at
Asian markets. I've also put this on fake chicken breasts. If you don't do fake
meats, I think this would probably be just as yummy over tofu or rice or pasta.

3 tbsp soymarg
1/3 cup thinly sliced green onions
1/4 cup chopped cilantro
2 tbsp finely chopped peeled fresh ginger
4 garlic cloves, chopped
8 oz fresh shiitake mushrooms, stemmed, caps sliced
6 tbsp soy sauce
3/4 cup soy milk
3/4 cup silken tofu
3 tbsp lime juice

Process soy milk and tofu together in a blender until smooth. Add soymarg, green
onions, cilantro, ginger and chopped garlic to skillet and saute until fragrant,
about 30 seconds. Mix in mushrooms and soy sauce and simmer 30 seconds. Add
soymilk/tofu mixtureand simmer about 3 minutes. Stir in lime juice.

-Mango, Ginger and Cilantro Sauce

I've only used this over fake chicken stuff, which I must say is pretty remarkable.

2 teaspoons olive oil
1 tablespoon minced peeled fresh ginger
2 large garlic cloves, minced
3/4 cup chopped peeled mango or fresh pineapple
1 tablespoon chopped fresh cilantro
2 teaspoons white wine vinegar

Heat 2 teaspoons oil in heavy small skillet over medium heat. Add ginger and
garlic; sauté 2 minutes. Add mango; sauté until heated through and beginning to
soften, about 3 minutes. Remove from heat. Mix in cilantro and vinegar. Season
with salt and pepper. Serve over fake chicken.

-Pesto

Great on hot or cold pasta or spread on sandwiches.

3 large garlic cloves
1/2 cup pine nuts
2/3 cup soy parm
1 teaspoon salt
1/2 teaspoon black pepper
3 cups loosely packed fresh basil
2/3 cup extra-virgin olive oil

With food processor running, drop in garlic and finely chop. Stop motor and add
nuts, cheese, salt, pepper, and basil, then process until finely chopped. With
motor running, add oil, blending until incorporated.

-Ponzu

This is a wonderful Japanese sauce that is a great salad dressing or dipping sauce.

1/2 soy sauce or Bragg's
1/4 cup rice vinegar
1/4 cup lemon juice
1/4 water
2 Tbsp toasted sesame oil
1 tsp fresh grated ginger
Put all ingredients in a jar and shake well.

-Ranch Dressing

Bet you never thought you'd get to have this again!

The Super Easy Slacker way:

1 package of Hidden Valley Ranch dip mix
	(the dip mix has no dairy, but the dressing 
	mix does have dairy, so be careful)
12.5 oz package of Mori-Nu firm silken tofu
Soy milk

*or*

The Spicy Ranch Dressing from Scratch Way:

1 1/4 cup veganaise
3/4 cup soy milk
2 tbsp chopped green onion
2 tbsp chopped fresh parsley
1 tbsp apple cider vinegar
1 garlic clove, minced
1/2 tsp grated lemon peel
1/2 tsp salt

SPICES: You should use between 1/8 and 1/4 of each of these, depending on how
spicy or how peppery you want it:

garlic powder
onion powder
dried thyme
dried oregano
ground black pepper
paprika
cayenne pepper

SLACKER WAY: Blend the mix and tofu in a blender or food processor. Add enough
soy milk to make it the right consistancy.. you might not want to add any if
you'll be using it as a dip, but you'll need to add some to make it "pourable"
as a dressing. Then just chill and eat!

FROM SCRATCH: Whisk all ingredients together in a bowl until blended.

-Roasted Garlic Dressing

This is my favorite thing to put on a salad!

12 cloves garlic
1 cup olive oil
1/2 cup balsamic vinegar
1/4 cup water
1 tsp salt
1/2 tbsp pepper
1 tbsp Dijon mustard

Separate (but don't peel) the cloves of garlic and roast in an un-oiled pan fpr
15 minutes at 350, truning occasionally. Set aside and peel when cool. In a
blender or food processor, blend everything together until smooth.

-Creamy Basil Dressing

This is a top-notch salad dressing!

1 cup loosely packed fresh basil
1 1/2 tablespoons chopped shallot
2 tablespoons balsamic vinegar
3/4 teaspoon salt
1/4 teaspoon black pepper
2 tablespoons veganaise
6 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil

Blend all ingredients in a blender or processor until smooth.

-Fresh Herb Salad Dressing

It's been years since I've bought salad dressing in a jar. When it's so easy to
make fresh, and it tastes so much better, why wouldn't you make your own? This
is another of my favorites.

1/8 cup Bragg's
1 tsp dijon mustard
1/4 cup balsamic vinegar
3 cloves garlic
pinch of black pepper
2 tablespoons fresh herbs (basil, oregano, mint, etc., or a
	combination of whatever you wish)
1/2 cup extra-virgin olive oil
Blend all ingredients in a blender or processor until smooth..


=Soup
-Cauliflower Cheese Soup

This is a thick and delicious soup! It'll help to satisfy your cheese monkey.

1/2 cup cashews (raw, clean)
3 1/2 cup water
2 cup cauliflower water from steaming
1/4 cup cornstarch
3 Tbsp. canola oil
1 tsp. onion powder
3 Tbsp. lemon juice
1/4 cup nutritional yeast flakes
salt to taste
2 tsp. Lawry's seasoning salt
1/4 cup dried parsley
1 head steamed cauliflower

Blend cashews with small amount of water until smooooth. Then blend remaining
ingredients, except parsley. Pour into soup kettle and thicken on stove. That's
it!

-Grilled Portabella Leek Soup

Hot Damn! This is some amazing soup!

4 bunches leeks
8 portabella mushroom caps, sliced
2 cups Grill Goddess Sauce
4 qts vegetable stock
1 cup cooked brown rice
3 tbsp cornstarch, dissolved in 1/4 cup cold water

Cut root ends off of leeks and cut them into long strips. Put leeks and sliced
mushrooms in a large mixing bowl with1 cup of the Grill Goddess sauce. Marinate
for a few minutes.

If you have a grill, grill the mushrooms on medium heat and flip and baste
occasionally until soft. Grill the leeks on low and keep them constantly moving
to prevent burning. If you don't have a grill, you can cook the mushrooms and
leeks on a baking sheet in a oven at about 400 degrees. After the leeks are
grilled, chop them up.

In a soup pot, combine portabellas, leeks, remaining sauce and stock. Bring to a
boil, add rice and simmer for 30 minutes. Mix cornstarch slurry into soup. Stir
for a minute and serve.

-Carrot Ginger Soup

Enjoy some ginger-y carrot-y goodness!

1 oz onions, chopped
4 medium carrots
2 stalks celery
4 oz potatoes, chopped
1 pint vegetable broth
1/2 tbsp grated ginger
juice of 2-3 oranges
zest of 1/2 orange
salt and pepper to taste
olive oil to saute
pat of soymarg

Saute onions and celery in olive oil in a large saucepan. After a few minutes,
add carrots and saute until onions go pearly. Stir in potatoes and add enough
broth to cover vegetables by a couple of inches.

Bring to boil, reduce heat and simmer until veggies are tender. Add the orange
juice, zest and ginger.Blend the soup.

Add more stock to achieve the desired thickness. Season with salt, freshly
ground black pepper, bouillon powder and soymarg..

-Kale and Potato Soup

This is based on a Portuguese soup, and it's super yummy!

2 garlic cloves, minced
1 1/2 cups chopped onions
3/4 cup sliced carrots
1/4 cup olive oil
2 large russet potatoes
4 cups un-chicken or vegetable broth
package of soy chorizo
8 cups packed kales, shredded thin
1 lb red potatoes

In a large pot, saute the garlic, onions and carrot in the oil over moderately
low heat, until vegetables are softened. Add the russet potatoes, peeled and cut
into 1 inch pieces, the broth and 4 cups water. Bring the lioquid to boil and
simmer the mixture, covered, for 10 - 15 minutes, or until the potatoes are
tender. While the potatoes are cooking, cook the chorizo in some oil over
moderate heat until browned (it will probably completely fall apart, but that is
ok). When browned, tranfer to a paper towel to drain.With a slotted spoon,
transfer the potatoes to a processor, add 1 1/2 cups cooking liquid and puree
until smooth., Stir the puree into the broth mixture, add the chorizo, the kale
and the red potatoes, cut into 1 inch pieces, and salt and pepper to taste.
Simmer covered for 10 minutes, or until the potatoes are tender.

-Potato Leek Soup With Cheese

This is a nice, thick, creamy, tasty soup. Mmmmm! Make sure to serve it with
bread for dipping.

1/4 cup (1/2 stick) soy marg
1 large leek (white and pale green parts only), thinly sliced
1 large garlic clove, minced
4 large potatoes (about 2 1/4 pounds), peeled, cut into 1/2-inch pieces
2 large carrots, peeled, cut into 1/2-inch pieces
4 cups un-chicken or vegetable broth
2 tablespoons chopped fresh dill or 1 tablespoon dried
3/4 cup soymilk
4 ounces Tofutti Better Than Cream Cheese
1 cup grated soy cheddar cheese (about 3 ounces)
Chopped fresh parsley (optional)
Additional grated soy cheddar cheese (optional)

Melt soy marg in heavy large pot over medium heat. Add leek and garlic; sauté
until tender but not brown, about 4 minutes. Add potatoes and carrots; sauté 5
minutes longer. Add broth and dill; simmer uncovered until vegetables are
tender, about 20 minutes. Remove from heat. Add soymilk to soup. Transfer half
of soup to blender. Add cream cheese and blend until smooth. Return soup to pot.
Add 1 cup grated soy cheddar cheese and stir over low heat. Season soup to taste
with salt and pepper. Transfer to large serving bowl. Garnish soup with chopped
fresh parsley and additional grated soy cheddar cheese, if desired.

-Chinese Chicken Noodle Soup

In the words of my husband, "You have made a perfect soup."

1 pound fake chicken (such as chicken style seitan), cut into bitesized pieces
3 tablespoons soy sauce
2 tablespoons dry Sherry
2 tablespoons oriental sesame oil
3 garlic cloves, minced
3 tablespoons tahini
2 tablespoons minced peeled fresh ginger
1 tablespoon sugar
1 tablespoon seasoned rice vinegar
1 1/2 teaspoons chili-garlic sauce
4 cups chopped Napa cabbage (from 1 head)
6 green onions, thinly sliced
8 cups un-chicken broth
1 14-ounce package fresh yakisoba noodles or Chinese pan-fry noodles
1/2 cup chopped fresh cilantro

Stir chicken, soy sauce, Sherry, and 1 tablespoon sesame oil in medium bowl to
blend. Let stand 20 minutes or refrigerate up to 2 hours.

Whisk garlic, tahini, ginger, sugar, vinegar, and chili sauce in small bowl.

Heat remaining 1 tablespoon sesame oil in heavy large pot over medium-high heat.
Add cabbage and green onions and sauté until cabbage is tender, about 5 minutes.
Add broth and bring to boil. Add chicken with marinade and tahini-garlic
mixture. Reduce heat to low and simmer until chicken is cooked through, about 5
minutes.

Cook noodles in large pot of boiling salted water until tender, about 5 minutes.
Drain. Add to soup in pot. Stir in half of cilantro. Season soup with salt and
pepper.  Sprinkle with remaining cilantro.

=Beverages
-Hazelnut Mochas

This is especially for those of you who live in places where coffee shops just
don't offer soy milk as an option.

Freshly brewed coffee
2 tbsp hot chocolate mix (there are many that have no dairy, such as Giardelli)
sugar to taste
hazelnut Torani syrup
soy milk
non-dairy whipped cream in a can

While the coffee is brewing, warm the soymilk (about 1/2 - 3/4 cup depending on
if you're making 1 or 2 mochas) over low heat. This is important.. it keeps
it from coagulating when it hits the hot coffee.  Pour coffee into a big ol' mug
(a mug that holds 2 cups of liquid) and fill it 3/4 of the way to the top.  Add
the hot chocolate mix, hazelnut syrup (I usually put one spoonful in) and sugar
(I use 2 spoons of sugar) and mix it up.  Fill to the brim with the soymilk.
Top off with a layer of whipped cream.

-Thai Iced Tea

You must make this as the perfect thing to accompany your Thai dishes.

6 cups water
1 1/2 tsp dried cardamom
3/4 cup sugar
1 1/2 cups soy milk
5 tea bags (I use English Breakfast)

In a saucepan, bring water, cardamom, sugar and soy milk to a boil. Remove from
heat and add tea bags. Cover and let steep for 10 minutes. Remove bags, transfer
to a pitcher and chill for at least a couple of hours.

-Eggnog

You don't have to be celebrating the birth of Jesus Christ to enjoy this beverage!

2 1/2 cups silken tofu
2 cups soy milk
1 tbsp vanilla extract
3/4 cup sugar
2 tbsp maple syrup
1/4 tsp tumeric
1/2 tsp nutmeg
1 cup rum or brandy

Blend it all together in a food processor or blender and chill.

=Stuff you dip other stuff in
-Olive Tapenade

This stuff is so so so so good! It drives me wild! If you love olives, you must
make this... think of it as olive hummus.

1 can of black olives
7 oz jar of kalmata olives (you have to remove the pits)
2 tbsp capers
2 tbsp tomato paste *or* some soaked sundried tomatoes
2 cloves garlic
juice of 1/2 a lemon
1/2 tsp thyme
1 tsp basil
fresh ground black pepper to taste *or* a red chili pepper
salt to taste
olive oil

Put everything into a food processor, except the olive oil. While you are
blending it, pour in just enough oil to make it the consistency of a nice
spread. Don't blend it too much... you should still be able to see chunks of
olives in it. Eat this spread on a nice bread. It's so so so so good!

-Vegan Pate

I impressed the pants off of my relatives with this last Christmas.

1 cup diced onions
5 diced mushrooms
2 cloves garlic, minced
splash of olive oil
1 cup of raw sunflower seeds, ground
1/2 cup flour
1/2 cup nutritional yeast
2 tsp dried basil
1 tsp salt
1 tsp dried thyme
1/2 tsp dried sage
1/4 tsp kelp powder
1 1/2 cups water
3 tbsp soy sauce
1 cup grated potatoes
1/3 cup olive oil
1 habanero pepper, minced

Preheat oven to 350. Saute onions, mushrooms and garlic in oil on medium-high
heat until tender. In a large bowl, combine ground sunflower seeds, flour,
yeast, basil, salt, thyme, sage and kelp. Add the water, soy sauce, potatoes and
oil and stir together. Stir in the sauteed vegetables and pepper and mix well.
Spoon mixture into a lightly oiled 9" pie plate. Bake for 45 minutes, or until
center is browned. Chill thoroughly before serving.


-Garlic Broccoli Spread

This is a lovely thing to whip up when you can't bring yourself to eat any more
hummus.

6 garlic cloves, peeled
2 tbsp olive oil
1/2 tsp crushed red pepper
2 1/2 cups broccoli
1 cup canned cannellini (white kidney beans), rinsed
2 tbsp lemon juice
Baquette slices, toasted

Preheat oven to 350. Combine garlic, oil and red pepper in a small custard cup.
Cover tightly with foil. bake until garlic is tender, about 35 minutes.

Steam broccoli until tender, about 8 minutes. Process with beans, lemon juice
and oil/garlic mixture.Spread on bread and enjoy.

-Peanut Dipping Sauce

A beautiful dip for Asian treats.

1/3 cup smooth peanut butter
1 garlic clove
2 tablespoons fresh lime juice
2 tablespoons soy sauce
1 teaspoon sugar
1/8 teaspoon cayenne, or to taste
1/3 cup water

In a blender blend together the peanut butter, the garlic, the lime juice, the
soy sauce, the sugar, the cayenne, the water, and salt and pepper to taste until
the mixture is smooth and transfer the sauce to a bowl. The sauce may be made 2
days in advance and kept covered and chilled.

-Creamy Artichoke Dip

I admit that I knocked my own socks off with this one. I also drove my relatives
wild on Christmas with this concoction, and now I think I'll have to make it
every year, because I don't think I can top it. I can't imagine that anyone
would EVER think this was a vegan dish!

2 8-ounce packages soy cream cheese, room temperature
1/3 cup soy sour cream
1/4 cup veganaise
1 tablespoon fresh lemon juice
1 tablespoon Dijon mustard
1 garlic clove, minced
1 teaspoon vegan Worcestershire sauce
1/2 teaspoon hot pepper sauce
3 6-ounce jars marinated artichoke hearts, drained, coarsely chopped
1 cup grated soy mozzarella cheese (about 2 1/2 ounces)
3 green onions, finely chopped
2 teaspoons minced seeded jalapeño chili
6 6-inch pita rounds, each cut into 6 triangles
Olive oil

Using electric mixer, beat first 8 ingredients in large bowl to blend. Fold in
artichokes, soy mozzarella cheese, green onions and jalapeño. Transfer to
11x7x2-inch glass baking dish. (Can be made 1 day ahead. Cover and refrigerate.)

Preheat oven to 400°F. Place pita triangles in single layer on baking sheet.
Brush with oil. Sprinkle with salt. Bake until crisp, about 10 minutes. Remove
from oven.  Maintain oven temperature.

Bake dip until bubbling and brown on top, about 20 minutes. Serve hot dip with
pita chips.


-Sundried Tomato Butter

Spread this on some hot bread and experience a most heavenly treat!

1/2 cup soy marg
2 tbsp fresh parsley, chopped
1 garlic clove, minced
6 sun-dried tomatoes, rehydrated and chopped
1/2 tsp salt
1/4 tsp pepper

Combine all ingredients in a small bowl and mix together well. Serve chilled.

-Avocado Salsa

This is the perfect salsa for freaks like me who don't like raw tomatoes and
onions. I also once brought this to a party and everyone loved this more than
the 7 other dips I brought along!

2 scallions, thinly sliced
1 jalapeno, minced
1 meduim cucumber, peeled, seeded and cut into 1/4 inch cubes
1/2 tsp onion powder
2 garlic cloves, minced
1/2 cup chopped fresh cilantro
2 ripe avocados, cut into 1/4 inch cubes
2 tbsp fresh lime juice

Combine all ingredients in a small bowl and mix together. Season with salt to
taste.

=Sides
-Coconut Rice

This is the best rice I have ever tasted! Definitely make some the next time you
have Asian (especially Thai) food. It is incredible!

1 tbsp margarine
1 cup basmati rice
1 cup water
2/3 cup canned unsweetened coconut milk
2 tbsp vegetable oil
slivered or chopped almonds (optional)

Melt margarine over medium heat.  Add rice and saute until it begins to turn
opaque, about 2 minutes.  Stir in the water and coconut milk and bring to boil.
Cover and reduce heat to low; cook until rice is cooked through and liquid is
absorbed, about 18 minutes.  Add salt to taste.  Serve it topped with the
almonds.. that makes it really good!

-Garlic Mashed Potatoes

Every one who eats these agrees that they are the best mashed potatoes ever!

3 large baking potatoes
1 tsp vegetable oil
6 garlic cloves, minced
3/4 cup soy milk
3 tbls soy margarine

Dice the potatoes (it is great whether the potatoes are peeled or not). Boil for
about 15 minutes, or until they are soft.  Heat oil over medium heat in a small
pan. Saute the garlic about 30 seconds. Add the soy milk and reduce to a
simmer.keep warn until the potatoes are cooked.  Mash the potatoes in a large
bowl. Add the margarine. Add just enough of the soy milk/ garlic mixture to make
them as creamy as you like.  For an extra special treat, serve with the Best
Gravy Ever!

-Black Beans in Mango Sauce

These are good as a side dish, or in a tortilla as an interesting burrito!

1 1/2 tbsp olive oil
2 cups minced red onion
1 tbsp minced garlic
1 3-inch jalapeno pepper, minced
1 1/2 tbsp minced fresh ginger
1 1/2 tsp cumin
1 1/2 tsp salt
3 15-oz cans of black beans, drained
6 tbsp lime juice
2 large ripe mangoes, minced
black pepper to taste
minced fresh cilantro

Heat the oil in a skillet. Saute onion, garlic, chili, ginger, cumin and salt
for 3 minutes on medium high heat.

Turn heat to medium low. Add black bean and half the line juice. Saute for 5
minutes or until beans are heated, and trasfer to a bowl.

Stir in the lime juice and mangoes and add pepper to taste. Cover and let sauce
develop for 15 minutes. Top with minced cilantro before serving.

-Mashed Sweet Potatoes with Maple Syrup

These are just wonderful, and they couldn't be easier to whip up.

2 1/4 lbs sweet potatoes, peeled and cut into 1 inch pieces
1/4 cup (1/2 stick) soy marg
2 tbps maple syrup
1/2 tsp ground cardamom

Steam the potatoes until tender, about 20 minutes. Mash them with the other
ingredients. Season with salt and pepper to taste.

-Pearl Couscous with Olives and Roasted Tomatoes

This is a beautiful side dish...

For Roasted Tomatoes and Dressing:

1 - 2 pints red grape or cherry tomatoes (depending on how much you like tomatoes)
3 large garlic cloves, unpeeled
1/4 cup olive oil
1/4 warm water
1 tsp lemon juice
1 tsp salt
1/4 tsp black pepper

For Couscous:

2 3/4 cups un-chicken or vegetable broth
2 1/4 cups pearl (Israeli) couscous
1 tbsp olive oil
1 jar unpitted kalmata olives
1/3 cup fresh, flat-leaf parsley, chopped
1/4 cup fresh mint, chopped
1 tsp fresh thyme, chopped

Roast Tomatoes and make dressing:

Preheat oven to 250F.

Halve tomatoes through stem ends and arrange, cut sides up, in one layer in a
large shallow baking pan. Add garlic to pan and roast in the middle of the oven
until the tomatoes are slightly shriveled around edges, about 1 hour.

Peel garlic and puree with oil, water, lemon juice, salt, pepper and 1/2 cup
roasted tomatoes in a blender until dressing is very smooth.

Make cousous:

Bring broth to a boil in a heavy saucepan, stir in couscous, then simmer,
uncovered, 6 minutes. Cover pan and remove from heat. Let stand 10 minutes.

Transfer couscous to a bowl and combine with the remaining ingredients,
dressing, roasted tomatoes and salt and pepper to taste.

-Carrots Glazed with Balsamic Vinegar and Butter

This is my new favorite way to make carrots. It is sweet and yummy..

1/2cup (1 stick) soymarg
3 1/2 punds peeled baby carrots or regular carrots, peeled, cut into 2 inch pieces, halved lengthwise
6 tbsp sugar
1/3 cup balsamic vinegar
1/4 cup chopped fresh chives

Melt soymarg in a large pot over medium heat. Add carrots and saute 5 minutes.
Cover and cook until carrots are tender-crisp, about 7 minutes. Stir in sugar and
vinegar.  Cook uncovered until carrots are tender and glazed, stirring
frequently, about 12 minutes longer. Season to taste with salt and pepper. Add
chives and toss to blend.

-Roasted Asparagus with Lemon

This is my favorite way to make asparagus.

3 tablespoons fresh lemon juice
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
1 teaspoon finely grated lemon peel
36 asparagus spears, trimmed

Preheat oven to 450°F. Mix lemon juice, oil and lemon peel in 15 x 10 x 2-inch
glass baking dish. Add asparagus; turn to coat. Sprinkle with salt and pepper.
Roast asparagus until crisp-tender, turning occasionally, about 20 minutes.
Serve warm or at room temperature.

-Saffron Almond Rice Pilaf

If you're feeling rich enough to buy yourself some saffron, I'd suggest making
some of this nice rice.

1 cup vegetable broth
1 cup water
Pinch of saffron threads
1/2 cup chopped onion
2 tablespoons soy marg
1 cup long-grain rice
1/2 teaspoon salt
1/8 teaspoon black pepper
1/2 cup sliced almonds, toasted

Heat broth and water in a small saucepan over moderate heat until hot, then
crumble saffron into liquid and stir. Remove from heat.

Cook onion in soy marg in a 2-quart heavy saucepan over moderate heat, stirring
occasionally, until golden brown, 5 to 8 minutes.

Add rice and cook, stirring, until fragrant and pale golden, about 3 minutes.
Stir in saffron broth, salt, and pepper and bring to a boil. Reduce heat to low
and cook, covered, until rice is tender and liquid is absorbed, about 18
minutes. Remove from heat and let stand, covered, 5 minutes, then fluff rice
with a fork and fold in almonds.

-Mexican White Rice

This is a very tasty white rice to eat with your burrito.

2 tablespoons canola oil
3 garlic cloves, peeled, halved
3/4 cup finely chopped white onion
1 1/2 cups medium-grain white rice
3 cups hot water
2 large fresh Italian parsley sprigs
1 1/4 teaspoons fine sea salt

Heat oil in heavy medium saucepan over medium heat. Add garlic; sauté until deep
brown, about 3 minutes. Discard garlic. Add onion to saucepan and sauté until
tender, about 5 minutes. Add rice; stir 5 minutes. Add 3 cups hot water,
parsley, and salt (mixture will sputter). Bring to boil, stirring. Reduce heat
to medium-low, cover, and simmer until almost all liquid is absorbed, about 15
minutes. Stir rice, then re-cover and continue to simmer until all liquid is
absorbed and rice is tender, about 5 minutes longer. Remove from heat; let
stand, covered, 10 minutes. Discard parsley; fluff rice with fork. .

-Roasted Brussel Sprouts with Toasted Garlic

This is the best way I have discovered to prepare brussels sprouts.

1 lb brussels sprouts, halved
1 tbsp olive oil
3 cloves garlic, chopped
1/4 tsp coarse sea salt

Preheat oven to 400. Put sprouts on a rimmed baking sheet and douse with olive
oil. Roast for 10 minutes. Add garlic and salt and roast for 5 more minutes.
When you serve them, sprinkle with whatever toasted garlic remains in the pan.

-Chard Mashed Potatoes

We all know that you have to eat your greens, but let's be honest... who really
*wants* to? This recipe is a great way to sneak some greens into your meal!

2 1/2 to 3 lbs. russet potatoes, scrubbed
2 to 3 tsp. salt
1 large bunch Swiss chard
1 Tbs. olive oil
1 clove garlic, minced
1/2 to 3/4 cup hot soy milk or soy half-and-half
2 to 3 Tbs. soy marg, room temperature
soy parm, for garnish, optional

Peel potatoes, leaving some skin on each. Cut potatoes into large chunks, and
place them in medium pot with enough cold water to cover. Add 2 tsp. salt, and
bring to a boil. Reduce heat slightly and boil until potatoes are tender, about
12 minutes.

Meanwhile, rinse chard well. Remove and discard stems and chop leaves coarsely.
In large skillet, heat oil over medium heat. Stir in chard and garlic. Cover
pan, and cook, until wilted and tender, stirring occasionally, 3 to 4 minutes.
Remove from heat.

When potatoes are done, drain and transfer to large mixing bowl. Add soy milk
and soy marg. Mash potatoes, leaving them slightly lumpy, adding salt and
pepper to taste.  Stir in chard and serve, garnished with soy parm if desired.

=Cheeses
-Fake Feta

I've gotta say, this is pretty feta-like!

1/4 cup olive oil
1/4 cup water
1/2 cup red wine vinegar
2 tsp salt
1 tsp dried basil
1/2 tsp oregano
1/2 basil

1 lb firm tofu

In a large bowl, mix together first 7 ingredients. Marinate the tofu in the
mixture for at least an hour.

=Salads
-Grilled Romaine Salad
Romaine hearts slightly charred on the grill, served with a fabulous
shallot-balsamic dressing accompanied by oven dried tomatoes

Prep Time: 30 Min
Cook Time: 2 Hrs 40 Min

Original Recipe Yield 4 servings

Ingredients

* 1/2 cup olive oil
* 3 tablespoons white sugar
* 1 teaspoon dried rosemary
* 1 teaspoon dried thyme
* 1/4 teaspoon salt
* 1/4 teaspoon ground black pepper
* 8 Roma (plum) tomatoes, halved lengthwise
* 2 shallots, halved lengthwise and peeled
* 1/2 cup balsamic vinegar
* 2 tablespoons brown sugar
* 1 3/4 cups olive oil
* 4 romaine hearts
* 1 tablespoon olive oil
* salt and pepper to taste

Directions

1. Preheat oven to 225 degrees F (110 degrees C). Mix olive oil, white
sugar, rosemary, thyme, salt, and pepper in a large resealable plastic bag.
Place tomatoes in the bag, seal, and shake to coat. Arrange coated tomato
halves cut side up on a baking sheet. Bake tomatoes 2 1/2 hours in the
preheated oven. Remove from heat, and let cool.

2. In a blender or food processor, finely chop the shallots. Add vinegar
and brown sugar, and process until smooth. Slowly add 1 3/4 cups oil,
processing frequently, so as to thicken the mixture.

3. Preheat grill for high heat. Brush romaine hearts with 1 tablespoon
olive oil, and season with salt and pepper.

4. Place romaine hearts on the preheated grill. Cook 5 to 10 minutes,
turning frequently, until slightly charred but not heated all the way
through. Serve warm on salad plates surrounded by tomato pieces and
drizzled with the shallot dressing.


